6. Give this city some love.
Jacket fish, 1 pc (I used half cut from a large fish for this recipe)
(If you are still reading, I am sorry. This has clearly turned into more of a rant than anticipated.)
Or maybe, my uterus was calling out to her. “Feed me!” or whatever it is that uteruses (or is it uteri?) would be prone to say. Maybe only women that have had more than three kids can recognize the voices of other women’s uteri (I googled it. FYI: uteri is the proper pluralization for uterus. Just in case, you know, you ever
Finding of Facts: Respondent very much was parked, period. The photographs taken by the traffic officer showed Respondent’s vehicle parked at 4:37PM, at which point Respondent exited the vehicle. The vehicle remained parked until 4:51PM, at which point Respondent returned to the vehicle and departed. In that span of fourteen (14) minutes, Respondent’s vehicle was parked unattended and, what’s more, there were no vehicles in front of hers, as she claimed. I therefore find Respondent Liable for this citation. Respondent is warned against making this sort of fabricated case in the future.
“I was being polite!”
As I have repeated numerous times, those looking for massive inflation can find it in China, not the United States. Demand for credit is so insane in China, that businesses will go to any length to get it. Note that those companies holding copper, especially those new to this wild financing scheme, are very vulnerable to a decline in the price of copper. Alternatively, those companies taking out loans based on copper collateral then selling the copper back to the exchanges have managed to get loans with no collateral.
I highly recommend this book. I’m not sure whether Jane grew on me a little over the series, or if I just became more invested after spending time in the books. In the first book I really did not like her at all. In the second book I started to like her more, and by the third book I found myself actually rooting for her. She will never be one of my favorite characters, but I don’t dislike her quite so much anymore.
Tickets to AC/DC’s Black Ice World Tour are available through Ticketmaster.com, Ticketmaster charge-by-phone, Ticketmaster retail outlets, or at ACDC.com. Specific market on sale dates and times are listed at Ticketmaster.com's AC/DC page. Fans ordering tickets through Ticketmaster.com will have an exclusive opportunity to pre-order AC/DC’s Black Ice album in connection with their ticket purchase.
Although the "dogmatic disbelief" of these intellectuals remained "intolerable," the religious tenets of his own lukewarm Protestant faith were equally unsatisfactory. Eventually his insecurely held faith, a remnant of childhood, "just dropped away… as easily as a child loses a first tooth." By the winter of 1893, he was an avowed agnostic, ceasing all church attendance and declaring to friends that he "didn't believe in a Christian faith." This was his state of heart and mind when, in 1897, he first made the acquaintance of Belloc.
We have a dining room that we never use except to do an occasional jigsaw puzzle so we decided to move all the gaming/Rock Band stuff in there with a mattress and pillows.....Here's Lane just relaxing a bit in the brand new gaming room..
I adored the party. I didn't have to do any planning besides make reservations. But mainly, it's just what Ella wanted. Besides a pillow pet of course.
“I’d give ‘em another wash or two,” he says at last. “You should be fine.”
1/2 lb. each (or 1-3/4 Cups), chopped
Desnoes & Geddes Limited Red Stripe Jamaican Lager
The bloke then scratches his dog - that part of a dogs body, just at the base of it's back whereby they quickly lick the air uncontrollably in delight (and this whippet does!) then he winks and smiles at the bar lady.
“Indeed, in God’s sight, the wicked are insubstantial, inconsequential: ‘They are like a dream when one awakes; when you arise, Lord, you will despise them as fantasies’ (v 20). The thought is akin to the last verse of Psalm 1: ‘For the Lord watches over the way of the righteousness, but the way of the wicked will be destroyed’ (v 6): not merely the wicked, but their way, so inconsequential are they.”
My denial caused me to think that it was the perfect time to continue with the housekeeping chores that I had already started. A sprained ankle couldn't keep me down, but apparently a chipped bone can.
Few cashew nuts
When you spend as much time at skate parks as I have especially ones filled with more little kids than skilled skaters, you get used to answering the same questions over and over again.
and I like to tell them when they give me this joy
But since illumination is what we’re after, let’s see if we can shed some light on what you as a reviewer should be looking for when evaluating the setting details an author has provided. Ask:
It's not about gaining attention or to print in capital letters that I even fucking care.
It’s a difficult situation. It doesn’t matter how large your company is, or how much productivity your company performs on a daily basis. Death is death, and it impacts everyone on one level or another. Support is out there, and it’s important to use those services made available. Remember, you are not alone and you will get through the most difficult times, as long as your allow others to help you along the way.
05. Oceans
Assorted "Button Bonaza" Buttons
The field of engineering offers vast scope for candidates. One of the most fulfilling and profitable careers in engineering is becoming chemical engineers. These professionals use the principles of chemistry for the manufacturing a wide range of chemical products. Besides production of chemical products, chemical engineers also design equipment for chemical plants. These engineers apply principles of chemistry and physics and engineering technology to manufacture products like synthetic rubber, plastic, gasoline, detergents, paper, cement etc. While doing their job, engineers are confronted with multiple problems that they need to solve using technology and by applying principles of chemistry. In case of large scale manufacturing, chemical engineers also design the manufacturing equipment and test the manufacturing method before implementing the procedure.
I went around and checked
A single tear of joy
With their tiny hands and fingernails, they expertly peel fruit or reach up to grasp your arm. Their inquisitive nature means they are always studying something new – a pair of sunglasses, a camera, a velcro pocket strip.
Since then I have made many a batch of biscuits myself and think I do alright. I haven't had any hockey pucks, though occasionally my biscuits don't rise really tall. These fell somewhere in between flat and really tall. I thought they were about the perfect height myself.
During the years of driving, the weeks really rolled one into the other. It’s something that a lot of people don’t realise, but when you have a group of 40 – 50 people for a week or 2, you develop a relationship with them. A bond.
One of the men was wearing a hoodie, the other a hat. Both had bandanas across their faces. They are black, in their 20s, 5-feet-6 to 5-feet-9-inches tall and about 150 pounds, Boyd said.
This hilarious "Gus" set comes complete with three hilarious sentiments - for anyone who has hunters in their lives, this set is PERFECT! :)
Taylor (3 years 8 months): Taylor could identify and name a half-dozen or so birds. Told that an infrequent visitor new to her was a bluebird, she replied, “I know it’s blue, but what’s its name?” (#550)
The silly mock-pathetic columns of Juxon House, each topped by a broken, blank-eyed Grecian head, were covered on November 9 with an architecture more parlante – hundreds of small posters, flyers, messages, notes, manifestos, declarations. 'GENERAL STRIKE!' reads the aptest, with a wild-eyed cat below. 'THE BEGINNING IS NIGH!' reads one. 'BEAUTY IS IN THE STREET' another, which is quite Urban Renaissance of them, though the poster's image of a barricade-laden thoroughfare is not very Urban Splash – and nor is the highly developed public infrastructure of the camp they look out on. In tents large and small are a University, Welfare centre, Clinic, Restaurant, Public Toilets (the latter especially unusual in contemporary London). The tents themselves are a Drop City of simple, curvilinear frames with multicoloured tensile artificial fabric – high-tech, though their users might not always think so. A line of armoured riot police, shields and truncheons at the ready, stand at the other side of Temple Bar, with a pastiche of the Monument in the background. As an example of detournement, a subverting of private space into public space, you really couldn't do better; it's a wonderful irony that the square's part-ownership by the Church has meant that the encampment is at Paternoster Square, of all places (though there are subsidiary camps at the time of writing in Broadgate and Finsbury Circus). It's the most exciting thing to happen to the City of London since the Lloyds' Building. Or the fire.
This week saw me at an online-teaching workshop (to help me learn how to teach online courses), and our typical schedule allowed an hour for lunch--which, in true professorial fashion, meant we would sit around talking. So naturally, I brought my sewing (I'm putting the final borders on the spring wallhanging, and oh, what a joy to sew such long seams!).
character, or situation?
The winner on my blog is Miss Scraps Alot!!! Please email your address to me at scrapbookingforfun@msn.com and I will forward it to Anne so she can get your prize sent out!
Sierra Nevada Celebration Ale is one of my holiday and winter staples. It is one of those beers that you will have a good chance of seeing in our refridgerator over the next few months. It helps that Cathy enjoy's it, so it is easier to have around than not.
Ram Restaurant and Brewery Salem Double Exposure IPA Double IPA "Hitting 100 IBUs is Ram Brewing’s Double Exposure IPA, crafted especially for the festival"
T. said: Right, babies aren't born evil, but after a certain age, people are responsible for their own actions. They can't blame their parents or society any more when they commit wicked acts.
That's all the time I have for now... thank you for your little notes of encouragement, & your comments that trickle in. They bring joy to my heart! Praying all of you are blessed today & every day.
So to make this post special, I'm sharing one of my favourite recipes. It's an appetizer (of course) and I learnt it a few years ago when my grandmother and I went to a cooking class for beginners. Hot, crunchy, buttery, cheesy, and clearly very easy to make since it was taught to me in a beginner's class, these asparagus spears are one of my family's favourite to eat as part of our appetizers.
A man with a zest for living life to the fullest, Irving embarked on an exploration of the subtleties of fine wine from Beaujolais to Zinfandel - and now he's ready to share his hard-won knowledge with you. With wit as dry as his favorite Merlot, Irving guides the reader on a fascinating, often whimsical journey, teaching us all we need to know about Kosher wine with information such as:
Internet separates us. I don’t care who says what about it, sitting in your office, furiously banging keys to communicate in all caps is not the same as yelling in someone’s face. Or discussing respectfully. Our intents connect, our information connects, but we do not connect.
Trying to put all of your pieces
9. write! I love writing, but currently the feeling isn’t mutual. Writing and I are currently on an indefinite break. I think we tried to rush things too quickly.
Each listing is separate and you get 2 total files. One PDF file that you can type in (or cut and paste) your favorite recipe and you also get lined cards as well. I keep a stack of lined cards in the back of my binder, in case I have to quickly jot down a recipe to add.
Thoughtful? Believe it.
Bio: I’m a long-time TV fan. I enjoy a variety of sitcoms and dramas but I usually try to steer clear of doctor and lawyer shows. I don’t watch many reality shows, either. Usually, it’s just The Amazing Race, Survivor, Project Runway, and Top Chef. I live and work in Connecticut and I graduated from the University of Connecticut. So, I also watch a lot of UConn basketball, both the men’s and women’s teams. When I’m not watching TV or writing about it, I’m running, baking, making ice cream, or reading comic books.
I also went to the Derby Festival Bed Races on April 30th. Getting to the Yum! Center where the races were held was fun as it started pouring while walking from where my friend and I had left the car. After a run through the rain, we made it to the Bed Races. It was interesting to see how well built the beds were. I was expecting much simpler designs since I never seen the event before. There were various types of beds with different ways of steering, but the overall results was a successfully fun event to watch. The action was fast paced and it was always more fun to watch the teams dressed up in costumes knock over the cones racing around the figure eight course.
If twitter is your thing, I will be using the hashtag #6letters
Or "Don't punch your sister."
He went galumphing back.
A year after his debut artist album, Guillaume Duchastel de Montrouge, aka DJ W!LDreintroduces the world to his raw and groovy sound for his second album, ‘Dirty’. A more straight up honest affair, this concoction of late night jacking cuts hypnotise with clever use of sampling – a nod to his penchant for hip hop – vintage feel and well carved beats.
I searched above.
Live for you, live at your highest vibration in this moment, everything will be perfect for you: timing, knowledge, contacts, development.
5. flip the onion over, turn the broiler on HIGH for 3-4 minutes to brown up the fish and onion
That skiffs your hearing till you notice it –
Doing a lot to say the least, but it was fun. We had fun. And I was just enjoying being around him. In his space.
If I were to listen
But Hasan isn't the sole guilty party. The US Army's unforgivable political correctness is also to blame for the casualties at Fort Hood.
Which is why the Twitspams I've been receiving for the past couple of weeks really stand out like a sore whatever (here's an example). They're all the same: an obviously fake sender name, the words "Writers Needed," a link, and a list of recipients. I've been reporting and blocking them, but when I checked my Twitterfeed today and found six of them, all sent within a few minutes of one another, I got curious, and clicked the link.
J: Tilt-A-Whirl or Rollercoaster.
Did you try any of the Love Dares out? I’d love to hear how it worked or didn’t work for you?
Happy Wednesday! I can't believe another week has passed. I feel like I just finished up my card for last week's challenge a few minutes ago. Time is definitely flying by and I hope that you all are making the most of it.
Standard of Fear
Today is another messy work day, so no outfit discussion today. Instead, I give you the first installment of my plus size shopping rant.
Write it in the comments below. Part 2 to follow
06 Rodrigo Leao & Vox Ensemble - Odium
I love the tall trees in my yard; I also love my garden. Fortunately, these two inclinations aren’t mutually exclusive, despite the “full sun” recommendations of many seed packets and gardening books.
“Everyone is needed. You are not here for no reason. Everyone who is here now has an important purpose. This is a hard, but a special time. We have the opportunity for growth, but we must be ready for this moment in history.”
Claiming that Proclamation No. 1801 and PTA Circular No 3-82 precluded them from filing an application for judicial confirmation of imperfect title or survey of land for titling purposes, respondents-claimants
Cream butter and sugar until light and fluffy, then slowly mix in cream cheese till it is evenly mixed. Add in white chocolate and dry apricot, then gently mix flour till a dough is formed. Make small balls out of dough. Give a small stab with fingers to flatten a bit and bake at 165 C in preheated oven for 15- 20 mins till turn pale pink brown.. Cool them for while for them to crisp up a bit!
Communication at the University of
~ DPWH Undersecretary Romeo Momo, one of the three senior officials in the controversial ‘photoshopped’ image
We are in the process of converting to a brand new, dazzling interface for LRLe-editions. In the meantime, the site is temporarily down. This should be resolved quickly, but please feel free to contact us at littleredleaves at gmail dot com with any questions.
I wonder at how God rejoices at our desire to draw near to Him and how He wants to reveal His glory to us yet so often we become blinded with the wish list we inscribed in our hearts and minds. It must break His heart to see us come so close and then turn back to dwell in the places we did not surrender to Him.
"If it ain't broke don't fix it. Folk wouldn't know a pus rich pint if it landed in their porridge. Probably think it were gold top" seems to be the motto.
To hear the details of Christ’s death on the cross is disturbing! But, it is a necessary truth that must be proclaimed and must be heard before there can be salvation. My friend, there is only one way for you to get to God and that is by the way of the cross. There is no salvation apart from faith in the work of Jesus on Calvary. Period.
Since this is an odd post anyway, I might as well say that I was insane to think that I would cover masking AND compositing in one month. In fact, I think one more masking tutorial is all I will do before changing themes for April.
For several years I have been following along on other people's blogs as they venture into participating in Becky Higgins' Project Life. I've never had the nerve to do it myself, though. It's a huge commitment and I knew that I wouldn't be able to keep up with it.
You will also find a new series of posts about keeping an old fashioned house account in a ledger book. This is called - House Account Monthly - for Prudent Homemakers. This will include tips on managing your money. I am talking about bookkeeping, budgeting, saving, and bill paying. This will not be about investing!
So. I woke up with twenty minutes to get to work and
Now let’s discuss a few more of your television, film and stage performances over the years. What’s the first thing that pops into your mind about:
Today’s digital photo frames are beyond anything most of us could have imagined just a few years ago. Riding in the car with family members I mentioned digital frames and no one knew what I was talking about. I wasn’t surprised because I had never heard of them either. We have not been living under a rock.
Place white chocolate chips into a bowl. Pour Baileys Irish Cream over chips and set aside. Preheat oven to 375-400 degrees (depending on your oven's temperament). Sift dry ingredients. Use a pastry blender to work in the butter. When the mixture is crumbly, add buttermilk and egg. Blend.
Still and tiny on the screen.
Before I go to bed tonight, I imagine that I will have read at least 100 pages of A Storm of Swords. I am incredibly thankful that I started reading the series now and that I haven’t had to wait nearly a decade between books like his more veteran fans have had to between A Feast for Crows and the soon to be released A Dance With Dragons. By the time that I finish book number 4, A Dance With Dragons should be released within a month or so, and I will be eagerly awaiting it more than any new release for a book since the last Harry Potter book.
12in12
2 alive
Datta: what have we given?
willingness to
Vicki B. 6x6 Paper Pad
Almost all licenses invariably permit companies to reproduce sound recordings (and thereby the underlying works as well) and sell them through CD's and the like. However, unless the license permits sound recording companies to broadcast the music as well or to permit others (through sub licenses) to broadcast, they cannot do so. And if they cannot do so, neither can FM stations, merely because they pay license fees to sound recording companies (or to PPL which collects on behalf of most sound recording companies). Two sets of rights are implicated, as I mention in this article here.
The two nuns look at each other, shrug, and decide that no harm can come from letting a blind man into the room.
Oh, it’s you. That high-pitched talking hurts my ears. And it kind of freaks me out. But I’ll deal with it if you let me out of this crate.
I’m trying to get ahead with my own personal cards so that I have a bit more time to take part in some of my favourite challenges. This is my card for my Brother in Law.
Then having had problems with cracking exhausts and the question over the original exposed exhaust design not meeting the R75 bodywork regulations, the car sported new exhausts, twisted near their exits and with slash cuts to make them flush with the bodywork.
Today in the news Labour run Newham council has created all sorts of controversy with their plans to exile the poorest in their borough to stoke on Trent of all places. This has been met with a volley of criticism rightly so in my view.
We hope that you support our politicians as they lobby for -- and win -- better benefits and programs, property tax exemptions, tuition education assistance, job training, employment assistance and counseling.
The M.S. 571 School Community will gather Wednesday, December 15th at 6pm in the auditorium of the school to discuss a Fact Sheet and letter distributed by the NYC Department of Education (DOE) and the District 13 Superintendent stating that Middle School 571 is unable to turnaround.
Pendragon: I agree. Next case.
I saw Brice leaving the house on my way to work this morning. It’s impossible to tell what his work hours are. Either that, or he avoids me. I keep wanting to take him some cookies or something, but with a body like that? I’m sure he works out. Hard.
I can’t complain of my first experience flying alone with the two kids. Although it was a very short flight I was a little bit concerned on how they, or rather I, would deal with it. We flew Garuda Indonesia since we’ve had several bad experiences with Air Asia Indonesia. The service was excellent. I love how they give you a special meal for the baby and a little bag with diapers, wipes and a little toy. The only other airline I’ve flown with similar perks is Emirates.
I don’t expect Topps Company to stay silent for too long. Remember, it took just minutes after stealing Ken Griffey Jr. from Upper Deck for Topps to release mock-ups of their first cards of “The Kid”. I wouldn’t be surprised if we see Pujols’ first Angels card before the week ends. As for now, all we have is Chris Olds’ masterpiece to keep us content.
Didn't mean to go all greeting-card on y'all. But it's true. I wouldn't typically have bacon and cheesecake married together, but listen to me, people: it ROCKS. This is some tasty filth, I'm tellin' ya.
About a month ago, I tried to figure out if this was still something that I wanted to do and if so, what was keeping me from accomplishing this task. I realized that there were two things that I was doing wrong. First, I didn’t have a plan. I kept telling myself that I would just pick up whatever Shakespeare play piqued my interest and when I was done with that one, I would move onto the next. Without a goal, there is no drive to finish. Second, I wasn’t reading the right editions of Shakespeare’s play. I was purchasing cheap copies that contained four or five plays back to back with no supplementary material. That meant that when I was slogging through Hamlet’s “to be or not to be” soliloquy, I had to try to figure out the meaning on my own.
My dad knew a lot of old folks. My dad is a sport. Born after the war, sure. But just barely. Not, like my mother, to a veteran and his young wife, but rather the fifth child of a man and woman who had already led quite the existence before The Munich Pact was ever even thought of.
1 tablespoon chopped rosemary
Absolut Pear – 40%
He is teamed up with Artemus Gordon. Gordon is played by Kevin Kline. He is the only bright spot in the film That is like saying it is a good thing you will save money on shoes because your feet have been chopped off. The bright side is sometimes overwhelmed by the dark.
These are the basic teachings in my relation to the world. I keep them as guiding principles, attempting to follow them in each choice I take. Another teaching of his I also attempt to follow, but which isn’t so crucial for the understanding of my approach to the question of synagogue and state, is “Be among the disciples of Aharon, loving peace and pursuing peace, loving people and drawing them close to Torah!” (Pirqei Avot 1:12).
In gaming thе console iѕ а popular medium fоr entertainment thrоugh video games. With the improvements in personal computer graphics аnd processing speed, dedicated simultaneous programs van bе utilized whіle playing thе highest graphic games. The cataclysm hardware requirements normal and ultra settings іn playing а game such аs world of war craft аre nоt fаr out оf reach.
That's the way Les talks.
Here is what my photograph looks like before and after using Photoshop to brighten it up...
In Iraq, there has been more uncounted harm done to the civilian population than in the counted corpses.
Marquis Maze, Pittsburgh Steelers
Smashwords: 126
Again, Weird.
You may make anything you like as long as it fits the challenge theme.
Describe yourself.
already known about its benefits and now you can
Plus if they are on sale (when aren't the frames on sale there!?!?!) or you use a 40% off coupon or hit on a day where your entire purchase is 20% off then you can get out of there without spending very much.
Rotring Rapid Pro 2mm Mechanical PencilOne of the comments on the recently published Rotring Rapid Pro mechanical pencil review was essentially asking about the differences between the 0.5/0.7mm and the 2mm Rapid Pro mechanical pencils. That’s a good question, and not something really covered in the review, so I will attempt to address it here. In a nut shell, there’s not much difference.
which arise in elementary particle physics and general relativity. But these elite applications only scratch the surface of the Theorem’s scope, and present unnecessary barriers to its accessibility. Emmy Noether’s elegant theorem of 1918, which connects continuous symmetries to conservation laws, offers a unifying perspective for all of physics, from classical mechanics to geometrical optics, from quantum theory to relativity.
And then take a moment to connect with something or someone and I guarantee you’ll find yourself just a little bit lighter, a little bit brighter, and you might be surprised to find yourself smiling for no particular reason at all.
Lately I’ve taken to examining television series, how they’re constructed, how they arc, and how so many writers and producers can keep track of a story and push it forward. Comic books are a great resource for such analysis: Superman, Spiderman, and Wonder Woman have all been with us for years. Dozens of writers have touched their story, added to its framework, sometimes radically and sometimes by embracing the status quo. Supporting cast members get killed off. New characters arrive to offer a fresh point of view. At the heart of the lifelong series is the timeless character, someone we can relate to and touches us enough that new generations discover them and their appeal does not wane. But they can’t survive on nostalgia alone. That much is clear when an imprint tries to bring back a classic character without giving them enough connection to current times. A timeless character has to find relevance in the world of their audience.
You may have noticed (as I mentioned above) that these tips are fairly simplistic, basic even! But I’ll remind you that a master is just someone who does the basics better than anyone else.
Yes those dreaded words I now have to whisper in my sleeping son’s ear every morning “Wake up!! its time for school”
BETA-HCG
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to wait for manifested consequences as some shit that will force me to change
Finally, when 0.08 BAC laws were slammed through during the Clinton Administration, we were told that MADD -- the major supporter of the laws -- didn't want to go further than that, that they were not a prohibitionist group. True colors, folks: MADD Canada is recommending 0.05 BAC in Quebec. When do they stop?
Hi everyone, it has been a while since I posted. We've been very busy clearing out an attic room which my son and I used for our computers and some storage for office supplies. Well the son has flown the nest and my computer is now downstairs in my 'craft room' so it just left the hubby's new computer and a lot of mess in the attic room. Time to clean up and clear out. It's all finished now, clean, repainted, spacious with enough shelving to do office supplies and the hubby's computer unit. Looks lovely, all I have to do now....is the rest of the house lol.
Their poison is like the poison of a serpent;
If you think of any other ogres and trolls in folklore and fantasy, please mention them in the comments!
Heddon-on-the-Wall grew up around Hexham Road, which until 1971 was the main road from Newcastle to Hexham. The A69 road bypassed Heddon-on-the-Wall which runs from Newcastle to Carlisle passing Hexham. Heddon-on-the-Wall benefits from its proximity to the A69 but is more popular with retired people rather than commuters due to its lack of a railway station, from which its close neighbour Wylam benefits.
-Ground roughly a cup of nut of your choice, mix with 1/2 cup sugar, 1 tablespoon rose water and two tablespoons of orange blossom water
Lies of omission are the most insidious. I feel almost sanctimonious about them, often telling myself, 'If I am directly asked, I will not lie." What a crock of shit.
Here in the UK Gugelhupf tins are relatively easy to find. I got mine from TK Maxx which usually sells a few different shapes and sizes. If you live in the US a bundt cake tin is fairly similar, although it is not as high as a Gugelhupf and not as elaborate. If you can’t find a suitable tin in any store, go to Amazon! They stock lots of different varieties for little money.
We came home from shopping and the girls had their mahi while they watched an Arthur movie I got from the Redbox. I also picked up Horrible Bosses for Matt and me. Oh my, hilarious, raunchy, but yes, totally hilarious. It was nice to kick back with Matt--we don't get to do that much.
Before booking any events, ask yourself why you want to go anywhere. What are you promoting? What's out there? Why go there? If you can find authors with experience at those venues, talk to them. A little planning is the best insurance against wasting your time.
Something died inside of me to sit with him and hear
Whatever your situation, there are people around who can help, try seek them out and speak honestly with them. They might be a trusted friend, co-worker or relative, a Church leader or Pastor, a Youth worker or staff at a job or drop in centre.
“Once we had a romantic and old-fashioned conception of honour, patriotism, chivalry and duty. But it was a duty which didn’t have much to do with justice, with social justice anyway, and in default of that justice, and in pursuit of it, that was how the great words came to be cancelled out. The crowd has found the door into the secret garden, now they will tear up the flowers by the roots, strip the borders and strew them with paper and broken bottles.”
I share what I know on Fashion & Technology with passion. I'm Best when I speak on the topic!
chin raised to the cold.
As soon as the Ranbir Kapoor character appeared, I groaned — not another Godfather rip off! I think the adaptation would have worked far better if instead of the umpteenth Puz0-Coppola derivation, the focus was on Devgan’s Karna.
So this morning I got 2 guys from Mauritius going to Ballymount, they didn't understand that the Luas would have brought them to work. It was the other direction that was affected.
3. Primary care physicians need to look to their patients. When patients come into the surgery looking for treatments that are of no benefit, or are not likely to lead to resolution of an illness or symptoms, GPs must be able to have rational discussions about the risks and benefits of treatment. Shared decision making processes can help with this (Implementing shared decision making in the NHS — Elwyn et al. 341 …) and result in better-informed patients making better informed choices. PROMS are an excellent way to make a start on this, and bring home the realities of life and illness to patients. We have an NHS, we are very lucky – it can’t and won’t be able to provide everything, and you may not need a treatment, just because there was a report once saying it might help you. Primary care physicians and teams really are the gatekeepers; we should not use a rationing mindset when discussing treatment with patients, but be highlighting the true intangible costs (physical and emotional) associated with some treatments where the benefits are marginal.
At 2am I thought it would look really cute with a gothic Lolita outfit but I guess my brain was not functioning right at that time. Maybe if the bows weren't that enormous...
4. Sanjay Gupta embarrassingly uncritical of John of God – Unfortunately, CNN hasn’t put up the video yet of this segment, but I’ve linked to their blog about it. For those who don’t know, John of God is a Brazilian con artist posing as a faith healer. He does nothing we haven’t seen other “faith healers” who have been exposed as frauds have done, and yet Sanjay Gupta and his guests still found him to be “mysterious.” In fact, given how many times they reminded the audience during this segment that the universe is mysterious and there are still things we don’t know, Gupta made it clear that journalistic and scientific integrity was not very high on his list of priorities. I intend to write to CNN to express my outrage over the segment and demand that they fire Sanjay Gupta for his anti-intellectual nonsense. I hope others will join me in this campaign.
Cautions:
I randomly mentioned to a friends husband who is a plumber that the thread on my loo was gone and was it fixable, he said it was and offered to come and fix it for me soon. He called a few days later to say he was close and if I was home he would drop in. He not only fixed my loo but connected up the little squirt for me. Hooray! Finally it was working. I waited for madame (Xave was day toilet trained by this point, yep that's how long it had been) to do one of her grossest poos. And you will never guess, the girl who poos at every single nappy change, went 2 only wet nappies before poo arrived the next day...
For example, Route Nationale No. 20 conducts
Lamest title evah. (don’t get me started on drama titles) I wonder if writers realize the title might be the very thing that makes someone choose to watch a drama or not. With this one, I couldn’t come up with anything catchy that would make viewers want to tune in either. “Eye-Candy Band?” or “The Boys in the Band?” Okay, those are lame too. I’m fired and promise never to try coming up with titles.
I laughed out loud and gave her a big squeeze. "That would be a bonus, Tink."
The Old Covenant was given so that man could prove what he was and what he could do.
I know the nice thing to say is “we’re all wired differently and that’s okay.” But it’s annoying when an entire culture, or hell, just the people I work and go to school with, can’t comprehend that some of us prefer tranquility and introspection over being a “social butterfly.”
In my last post, I talked about various border ideas for my hexie quilt. While going through some old magazines I came across this quilt in an American Patchwork and Quilting 2005 magazine.
Shows how teachers and professors get fired and have careers ruined because they believe in God and challenge Darwin.
My kids love playing with magnets. We found these magnet wands and little magnetic toys at a local school supply store. They were very inexpensive. You can do some fun things to teach kids about magnets.
Get down on your hands and knees
But it’s not what it looks like.
Elizabeth reined in and, under her breath, cursed the man driving. He climbed down and she recoiled (can you show her more, use her body language to show this, how does she climb down and recoil is a little vague?) Whether it was him or the cart that stank strong enough to turn her stomach, she did not know. This last sentence has some structure issues that makes it clunk … consider … She couldn’t say if the stench came from him or the cart; but it was enough to turn her stomach.
But 'not liking the exhibits' is not normally considered a sound basis for excluding viewers from a public gallery - particularly not when that gallery received 40% of its funding from taxpayers.
That sweet, young teacher's aide from Albany, New York is one KAYLEE DEDRICK, who gained notoriety when she was pepper-sprayed by a MEAN NYC cop.
Kasoori Methi - 1 tbsp.
In the last week I have managed to pick up these beers from my local supermarkets. There has been a lot of chat on Twitter & blogs regarding the Tesco American Double IPA brewed by Brewdog and the positives/negatives of it being released as Hardcore IPA in disguise. In my opinion I couldn't really care what bottle it comes in, what label is on said bottle as long I get some in my glass! It really is a fantastic beer! That goes for the others too!
-- and for what? To scream for more free stuff from the government! Yet
And so, I decided to write angered Blog rants instead so I don’t look like a complete and total hosebeast who would rather pull her fingernails out with pliers than press the ‘Log In’ button at work each day. Usually, the people that make self mutilation a sunnier option than going to work are bosses and co-workers. However, this is not the case for me. My boss is a cool guy who knows memes and has a sense of humor and my co-workers are people who deal with the same vile, idiotic, under-evolved creatures that I do: customers.
Jerry's latest passion is the World of Warcraft game. I don't know much about it, but I did recently read an article about how "video games are becoming the new hotbed of scientific thinking for kids today." And WoW was featured heavily in the article. Then, yesterday, we were driving over to Jerry's dog walking job and he started talking about selling stuff on the game (things like tools or potions, I think). He said he always sells his stuff really fast because he looks at the prices other people are selling the same or similar items for and then he prices his items one to five gold pieces lower.
Also, remember, there’s always graduate study if you change your mind. Another friend, who did the same undergraduate degree as me decided that she wanted to move away from the vagaries of literature to a more defined career path. After working in a school with children with learning difficulties she enrolled on a two year speech and language therapy course, and is now working – you guessed it – as a speech therapist.
The hearts and scalloped circles are cut using the Cricut Lacy Labels cartridge. The swirls on this card are also cut from the Lacy Labels cartridge, but they were a part of a frame so I used my knife and cut all the frame/flower details out of it so just the swirls were left.
4) What do you think makes CRACKED different than other books about bullying? What can your novel say to teens that others haven't?
I will never forget (and have probably mentioned it here before) holding that cold key in my fist, looking up at the principal in disbelief, and then, after thanking her, running down the hall like a crazy person (and hearing her yell, "No running in the halls!" behind me.)
What I really love about this single is the photo of the band. They all look so young and devil-may-care, particularly Mr. Greg Cartwright in his charity shop suit and bow tie. Enjoy.
4. Welcome Home (Sitar by Ashok Sharma)
Bummer. I'm convinced they'll figure it out some day. To get all the thrilling excitement of discovery, here's the ORIGINAL ARTICLE.
“Oh. No. Not really. I mean, I was just–”
2:00: Collapsible C is lowered with J. Bruce Ismay on board.
Taking place in 1889, The Arctic Marauder stars Jerome Plumier, a passenger aboard L'Anjou, journeying through the coldest reaches of the north Atlantic, when a member of the ship's crew spots a ghostly ship shrouded in ice and perched atop an iceberg. Along with a few crew members, Plumier joins the expedition that goes off to the ice-ship in search of survivors or clues. The search turns up little more than dead bodies, seemingly frozen in time. Before they can round everyone up and head back to L'Anjou, a huge explosion rocks their ship, sinking L'Anjou and spoiling any hopes of a safe return for Plumier and company. Stranded for days, drifting on the ship atop the iceberg, they are finally rescued and returned home.
Brien Jones
“I have no idea, honey. It’s not like she would have gotten in trouble. Accidents happen. I would just like to know when things happen in our house,” I replied.
The study, Prices These Days! The Cost of Living in Australia, says some necessities, including electricity, mortgages, medical services, fruit, bread and vegetables, have become more expensive but the price rises have been offset by dramatic falls in the cost of computers and audio/visual equipment. Items such as toys and household appliances have barely changed in price.
Big stuffed horse for my bed
Long Live FRIDA!!!
But here's the thing, of the blogs that I skipped over because their A to Z posts were short, frivolous things (like A is for Apple (because I really came across that one (more than once))), how many of them actually have blogs worth following but were "lying" during the A to Z month because the short posts attract more flies? I'll never know.
Kevin Hamm
Don’t underestimate the prayers and worship of our little ones! It’s POWERFUL! Their praises are silencing the enemy.. WOW! If you have little ones, start encouraging them to talk to Jesus and ask Him what He is thinking and feeling. If you don’t, ask God to give you the heart of Malachi 4:6.. to be a “father” to the fatherless. To turn your heart to children, and pour what He has put in you into the young ones!
Mary: "Sir, you had an appointment today, and you missed it. We don't have another. The best I can do is tomorrow."
372 pages
ChokeyCharlie started to cry. This was not unexpected because he missed his nap time this afternoon.
o, btw..
Now I was super lucky to get some of the new collection from Bron which included Edwin which meant that I was going Red and Brown....I have to admit I was a little hesitant using this colour combo but they fit perfect with this image and I have to say that I LOVE how it came out. Feels really old worldly to me..
I wanted to tell her, that she could make it, but she needed to open her eyes, ears and senses.
The Cheetah People generally wore leather and trophies from their hunts, using horses as mounts. They had the ability to teleport from planet to planet, but they can only bring back prey to their homeworld. Similarly, they must have a link to a world, inthe form of an inhabitant of that world to return there.
That the wise would later reprove.
Spicy foods and alcohol simply don’t mix too well together because the alcohol acts as magnifying agent to the heat. When you choose a beer while eating heat, pick one with lower alcohol content - but please don’t forget flavor. Fats help to calm the fire and this is why I typically order guacamole or queso with the chips and hot sauce when drinking.
By handing lead agency duties to Minneapolis-based Fallon—the shop Mr. Turtledove hired while he was at TheLadders.com—Mr. Turtledove sends a clear sign he’s ready to put his stamp on the company. The move comes on the heels of the abrupt departure of H&R Block CEO Russ Smyth earlier this month.
Dogfish Head 90 Minute Imperial IPA does not seem to do much on aroma, but it whacks you around the head and shoulders with the flavour of strawberries. The aftertaste is lingering, with something like a Sharpie pen hit of gorgeous, lasting hops.
If it weren't for John Tortorella, many of the kids who got promoted and played extremely well would have been gone at the trade deadline. I'm convinced of that. Glen Sather did hire the man responsible for drafting the current talent pool though. I cede him that. He replaced Don Maloney with Gordie Clark and the drafting has indeed gotten better; evidenced by this year's pool. But Sather would have surely sent them packing considering all the injuries the Rangers were sustaining as last season's trade-deadline approached. And he surely would have committed us to even more salary-cap hell.
Not another fine
This is a question that people keep asking me. If it is important to the people of Barpool ward then it is important to me that they know the true figure.
LOTS of intense action.
In a frying pan, with a bit of olive oil place in onions,mushrooms and parsley. Cook on medium heat until onions turn a light golden color. Season with garlic powder and a bit of salt. While that is happening, wisk eggs with salt and pepper, for taste, and then add in the cooked veggies into the wisked eggs and mix in together. Then place once again, in a lightly coated frying, and let it cook. If it looks a little golden brown on the bottom, THAT’S OKAY. It’s supposed to. That means it’s time to flip. Then simply serve.
Not that you all probably need any inspiration to use flowers but the Sisters have created some lovely flower projects to share with you. This first one is mine and I used the Flip Flops from Shelly's Images.
I would probably call this look more stolen or shamelessly copied than inspired by… the one and only Bad Ass Kasmira.
UGH. Okay, so there’s still a pretty big pile of mail, but I’m in NO mood to deal with any more of this shit today, so I promise I’ll answer as much of it as I can next Monday. In the meantime, keep it coming. I’ll talk to you all later when I’m not dreaming dreams of ruins in the fucking swamp.
* When you make eye contact with someone, offer a happy smile and see how that lifts the mood of both you and the recipient of the smile.
Mary, Queen Of Arkansas
7th grade, and I’ll have her add the journaling as she gets more into the school year. More About a Girl, but this was a transparency that I just put over white cardstock. The chipboard accents are Basic Grey that I added bling to (lots and lots of bling) and also added to the transparency. Also, first year she won’t have the class picture since they’ll get year books! :)
I always like when people think out loud here on my blog, when something I have said strikes an answering chord, and often when they’re not sure if they are making sense, they make the most sense to me. The only good thing about my grief is that I’ve met some wonderful people who are struggling with the same questions I am, and I’ve had some thought-provoking discussions about the meaning of life, death, grief, and whether any of it matters.
Step 1:
When she opened her eyes again, it was nearly daylight, she was back in bed, and her friend of the night had gone. A new nurse was standing there, replacing the drip bag.
The Nubs were a three piece from San Francisco. As far as I know this was their only single. I found this page from a couple of years ago. At the time, they had reformed, been playing out, and released a CD, with this single, as well as a bunch of tracks that I think were recorded later. I've never heard the disc, and I'm not sure if it's still available, or even if The Nubs are still around or not. I know this one can be found other places on the net, but someday when it's time to put this blog to rest; It wouldn't be right to have not included this classic.
And yes indeed...it did! I wanted to share with you all the scene from the Jardin de Luxembourg yesterday. As you can see, all's well here in Paris, as many came out to enjoy one of the few places in the city where you can actually use the grass.
The novel sticks really close to Kambili’s head, so I’m thinking that the potential reader’s enjoyment of the novel is very dependent on much you like or sympathize with Kambili. I personally thought Kambili was a lovely protagonist, and loved being inside her head. I love seeing how timid and quiet she was at first, and then how she grew from thereon out. We’re so in her head and her personal problems and concerns that the problems with the riots and censoring in contemporary Nigeria take a backseat, but I don’t think this is a detriment to the novel at all. Reading from Kambili’s perspective was like having a glimpse at her innermost thoughts, a peek at her private diary, and there’s something so honest about the narration that I just completely fell in love with. This novel does more than just capture an amazingly authentic teenage voice – it moves you with its sincerity and honesty.
That was the best part.
I have witness’d the true lightning, I have witness’d my cities
I don't know about you guys but I have had the hardest time finding vintage lately!!! Theres cute things on Etsy but the prices are too high for me right now for the most part and Ebay hasn't had much of anything. San Diego is rather picked through when it comes to vintage and there aren't a lot of vintage shops anyways. I know that as summer comes around this will change, so for now I have been seeking out modern clothes with a vintage look. I included some of them in my last post and I recently bought a few more that I wanted to share with you.
“My Master seeks audience with you.” Benny said motioning behind himself with a flick of his head.
The soup could be shorba from the north or a rasam from the south, but I decide on a kadhi that hails from either Maharashtra, Gujarat or Punjab. It is one of my favourite starters and can be served with or without the dumplings. (Interestingly, the west coast version of this soup is generally served cold and has no yoghurt added, it is called sol kadhi and uses coconut, another one for our vegan friends!)
Johnny Drew a Monster
Then I looked up and cried again !!!! …
My veterinarian friend, Dr. Katie, tells the story about the December when a woman brought a very sick black lab into her clinic. The dog was only ten months old, so she was really just a big puppy, but she’d been vomiting incessantly and her worried owner didn’t know what was wrong.
Your facebook status goes blank for days or weeks.
Dennis Farina (Striking Distance)
I had an opportunity to review Abaya Collections and their fantastic range of Abayas. Read the review below and let me know what you think, we also have secured a brilliant dicount for all you Hijablicious ladies in time for Ramadan and Eid, so place your orders now!
46. Luhan predebut.
I enjoyed creating last week's 'Other People' MMMay'12 round up so much. It was really fun to see my loved ones wearing something I'd stitched each day, even if extracting and collating the documentation was a bit of a headache! Ok, so let's check out the second week's wears...
Gibson asked why Moyo had not mentioned in his statements to police following his re-arrest that Erasmus was the one who told him to leave the court.
7. Crystal Reports
Now we are in Santa Barbara. Again more school groups and presentations at the SB Maritime Museum, our kind and gracious hosts. Captain Mark Schrader's father, Richard, lives here in town and at age 93 was on the dock to greet us. Special moment.
Johanna Frappier is a fantastic story teller, weaving intricate tales within the story itself, culminating in a nail biting finale... which left me desperate for book number two... which I've now read. My review follows soon!
TBB:Are any of your characters based on real people?
Except for that we didn’t hang out again for another month and that was basically when I set up a booty call. He’s talked to me once since then, and only when I texted him to ask him for advice for dieting. I was starting to do Muay Thai and MMA and knew that he was a trainer and a chef, so who better to ask? He gave me some pointers and asked what gym I was going to. I told him and that ended the conversation. 2 days later, who do I see at the gym? Yup, he’s there. And he pretends that I don’t even exist. Awesome. Now I look like a crazy psycho stalker, haha. Luckily, he’s only been there twice that I’ve been there in the past 3 or so months.
--The next day, sift the colored granulated sugar onto a cutting board and turn the pan over in order to remove you’re soon to be Peeps. Tap the stiffened Marshmallow out of the pan and remove. Use your favorite “animal –like” cookie cutter and shape your peeps. Dip the cut sides of each strip into sugar to coat then cut each little bit.
“4. We will encourage producers to create healthy backstage working conditions, including healthy food options and a respect for privacy. We will encourage casting agents not to keep models unreasonably late.
It is totally inter spacial..
What has impressed me in the denunciation of replacing a voluntary loan system with a compulsory subsidised system is that many commentators in the mainstream and alternative media object to the loss of individual responsibility that this will entail; young citizens will no longer feel that they owe anyone anything in exchange for the tuition, and this does not encourage responsible citizenship.
Politico and the liberal media in general are in the process of "Palinizing" Republican presidential candidate Herman Cain. The anonymous, vague allegations of gestures and comments that might make some people "uncomfortable" are the thinnest of gruel, but Politico has managed to squeeze not one or two, but over ninety stories out of the "scandal". When shock jock Howard Stern opined that it's nothing more than a smear campaign, sidekick Robyn rebutted that 'that's what politicians do'. This is par-for-the-course liberal equivocating, but the fact is that this wasn't done by a politician, it was done by an alleged news publication - an entity that, if nothing else, opens itself up to litigation when it resorts to peddling fact-less innuendo. It seems the future of journalism is distortion and allusion - turning allegations into convictions - and the future is now. Don't forget to stir the coals and implicate more republican candidates report on speculation over where the leak is coming from (when you already know damn well)!
To their dismay, Bourne has been trained too damn good, and when Landy and the CIA believe they are completely on top of the situation, Bourne shows them that they are MILES behind him. Bourne is like a mechanism – once you set it into motion, it cannot be stopped. He lives up to his threat from the first film that there would be no measure to just how hard and how fast he would come down on these people if he even felt someone coming down on him. Everything builds to explosive, intense levels to where the wrong move could get anybody killed.
Accepting the fate of all of his fears
She has a passion for bricks and sausages… (It is a long story)…
The term Core Addiction Syndrome will establish both chemical and behavioral addictions firmly into the lexicon of medical terminology which will be required for its acceptance into the community of behavioral health providers.
- the pigmentation is not the best; I need at least 3 swipes to get my line saturated enough.
A moment white - then melts for ever;
Ok, I’m writing at home. Happy ?
That's my offering for the day, hope you enjoy it!
like. It is a mask I try on.
I hope this is an indication that styles are changing and returning to a more softer and romantic look rather than the sleek pared down look that has been popular lately!
With Photoshop, what was once an exception has become the rule. Everywhere we are bombarded with images of women who look like Greek goddesses. Yet, since the retouching made by Photoshop is often quite subtle, if it is done well, we have become oblivious to how much we have been manipulated, and inured to the sight of the artificial beauty we have been inundated with.
Have you ever been stuck between the sea and the devil… well I have and trust me it is not a good place to be in. What to finally choose. The result is I am sitting on the fence contemplating my next move. It’s poking me in the ass as it can’t take my weight but which side do I go.
The thing is: you can simplify your to-do list, but you can't really simplify people. We are just a complicated bunch.
As with so much else, the true hate behind the hate crimes laws lurks in the hearts of those who drafted them, and they have only just begun.
Embellies: lace, ribbon, charm hearts, pearls, Wild Orchid craft flowers
Japanese White Egg Eggplant - 72
about glassware and collecting it.
The Office
YA can also be cold.
I don’t know if I would have been able to do it without the internet and social networking. I wonder how people managed before these wonderful tools. I understand why the internet is such a danger to high control groups such as the Watchtower Society. The reason they disfellowship is so members will return out of desperation due to excessive loneliness. In a recent Watchtower (April 2012) Paragraph 17 on page 12 explains the significance behind this practice:
when this work has been performed properly. However,
Picturesque setting, memorable characters, and a suspenseful plot characterize Blue Asylum. If you’ve never read Hepinstall before, let this be your introduction. She is an author worthy of your attention.
The Court of Appeal's decision confirms that speculative, wide ranging uses identified at the point of patent filing are not enough to satisfy the requirement for industrial applicability. The patent needs to disclose specific and practical ways of exploiting the invention. As a minimum, there must be a real likelihood that a proposition made regarding the function of the product is true. It seems that discovering a nucleotide sequence encoding for a human protein and being able to show that the protein concerned has some common homology with known proteins may satisfy Article 57, but whether it does or not is case-dependent and in particular depends upon how well established the functions of the other members of the family are.
While winding our way back to Waikiki, we stopped at a Foodland and picked up some snacks, including ahi poke and tako poke (tuna and octopus, each marinated in soy sauce and other ingredients).
a refrain repeated five times, and once
May your eyes blaze like rubies with rage!
each day it’s back
Some people argue that his approach was elitist.
Since politically deceased Newt Gingrich has also been hammering the President with Alinsky during GOP debates, herewith a word-for-word reprint of a post from March 27, 2007 to help voters judge for themselves Breitbart’s “stunner”:
The official reports of radiation levels are going to be generally reliable. Here and over there.
-Best Movies of 2010
The next day my character went to see the Bachelor to discuss some findings, and I found a man overcome with exhaustion. The Bachelor said that if we couldn’t discover the truth about this disease soon he was going to shoot himself rather than let the illness kill him.
So here they are...
I unstopped my guest bathroom sink and my bathtub last week by doing this. I was going to post pictures, but I didn’t want to gross anyone out!
The strong connection is lost
The Yossi Harel Chair in Modern Israel Studies, named after the renowned captain of the Exodus ship that transported Jews to Palestine in 1947, would, claimed Lord Weidenfeld, "provide a rallying point not only for teaching but general information and support of students. It is very important to have in some key universities, particularly those with an anti-Israel or antisemitic presence, a solid intellectual base with a good professor who will be able to support students through seminars or meetings."
That song was written in 1895 and those words are still just as true. Heroes were made that day and many died that day as well. I love that America didn't just fall down and die as the terrorist would have hoped. We stood together, our heads held high, linked arm in arm and ready for a fight. That's what makes us a free country. That's what makes this the "promised land," and I am proud today to call myself an American!
This year was a bit different. One, because I got cake from my boss, and a birthday greeting compilation from Marla . We also watched The Avengers before calling it a day. I would not consider it celebrating, but it is already different (in the best way) than the usual birthdays I had.
You haven’t heard the best part yet; Ghafoor was arrested over a month ago and is scheduled for a hearing this week, so they could easily have served him with a warrant at that time at no taxpayer cost and with no danger to bystanders. Of course, that wouldn’t have allowed them to play sadistic cops-and-robbers games with automatic weapons. Still, the question remains…who did these buffoons expect to find in the house that led them to believe they would need a SWAT team? An elite team of armed assault strumpets, perhaps? I wonder if Pittsburgh area cops have been communicating with those from Johannesburg?
Despite the morning's challenges, my Garmin said I finished in 27:30, with an 8:54 average pace. Splits:
I slept for about an hour and when I woke up my dad and 2 other sisters were there.
Mark your calendars—May 9, 2012, the President of the United States of America finally crossed a line from which there is no return without repudiation and repentance. Terrorists are dangerous. The economy is a real and present danger. But there is simply nothing other then the holocaust of the unborn which imperils the safety of our country or places our people in jeopardy as does the leader of the Western world publicly raising his fist at the Heavens and declaring that the bedrock institution of society, ordained of God and meant to be protected by the state, is little more than a convention of convenience for the children of Sodom to transform the meaning of something which is precious to Jesus Christ and a living picture of His love for the Church, into a legally protected justification for perversion, and vehicle of hatred aimed directly at that love.
Camaal: (Laughs)
This was how the island looked up until last week. I think I will go down in a world record book for most changes to a kitchen island, for real. FOR REAL.
Forget your details; simply just strive and capture!
Iván Meade - You are extremely well know for your residential spaces in Victoria, but what some may not know is that you have created some of the most beautiful retail spaces in Vancouver as well. When you are designing retail spaces you often have to follow the requirements of the brand, how have you achieved cohesiveness between your style and creativity and the clients needs?
“Not exactly.”
Come see me!
As weird as it sounds, this honesty thing took me a little while to get used to. But I’m finally learning to appreciate it (most of the time, that is). After all, who wants to be told they look awesome when they actually look like a color-blind hippo that got dressed in the dark? Which reminds me, never tell a German you like something or that something looks good if you don’t mean it. If your true feelings came out later, the damage caused by your little white lie would far out-weigh any good intentions you had.
The Na’vi, in short, have not only rejected the “Sky People’s” military but their scientists who think of the Na’vi and Pandora simply as biological parts to study, and treat them, in their own way, as stupid savages that need to be taught the human way in human schools in order for the Na’vi to get out of the corporation’s way. When Jake becomes hybridized as a human soul in a Na’vi body, he’s really hybridized as being a military creation living inside a scientific creation, and it’s this hybridization that leads to the Na’vi accepting them into their midst.
“Where are you going, Moth, Slug, Roach, Cricket, Mouse, and Bat?” said the Cat.
His small force was now completely hemm’d in, in his works,
Tom Sagar put in another fine performance on his RMX450Z, emerging with the E2 championship lead after two days of consistent riding. Being strong from the off, Sagar initially rode close to the times of David Knight, who increased the gap as the day progressed. However, Sagar stayed focused and took everything in his stride, finishing strongly after almost 14 hours of riding over the two days.
although I find it mostly peaceful.. the creation process for me, is sometimes hard and draining.
Sturm, R.A., D.L. Duffy, Z.Z. Zhao, F.P.N. Leite, M.S. Stark, N.K. Hayward, N.G. Martin, & G.W. Montgomery. (2008). A single SNP in an evolutionary conserved region within intron 86 of the HERC2 gene determines human blue-brown eye color. The American Journal of Human Genetics, 82, 424-431.
to be put in a drawer
Do I do this every month? Yes :(
If you haven't yet, I encourage you to check out Victoria's new short story and the ROAK blitz, which will be going on all week. I'm still working my way through the blogs on the blitz list, and let me tell you there are some amazing people out there doing some wonderful and generous things. If you need your faith in humanity lifted (and who doesn't these days?) you should take a look.
That “someone” could take on so many forms depending on the specific person and the material desired. One example I can think of would be a small businessman trying to make more profits, so he finds an avenue that he hadn’t explored before.. and it works, but he runs into someone (a bigger businessman) who has already traveled down that road and has a sort-of private claim to this particular profit scheme. This person allows the smaller businessman to make his additional profits, but he charges a fee and/or restricts certain actions in regards to the scheme.
But at least it is something. I have one more Biology class to go (Microbiology) and I can't wait. Even though I'm not taking it this semester. I need a break from biology. Not that I did bad it is just challenging. It requires a lot of study time...
"What's your name mate? It's not Lassie is it?"
"Well, they flipped a coin, one team got it and then for the rest of the game all they kept screaming was 'Get the quarterback! Get the quarterback!' I'm like....Helloooo? It's only 25 cents!"
I shook my head, cursed the auto driver and decided to walk to office that morning, regretting having taken the most expensive auto-rickshaw ride, one which didn’t even take me from point A to point B.
If the frosting is too thin, place it in an airtight container in the refrigerator for about 10 minutes until somewhat firm. Frost the cooled brownies with orange cream cheese frosting and decorate with orange sprinkles.
i'll be back later with more news.
I bought it for the color of the glass, which is a greenish-yellow (almost neon). It smells great, too. Jordan and I both love great-smelling candles burning in the house, so they're a treat that we are constantly indulging in :) This one is the Capri Blue brand that is always burning at Anthropologie, but it's a different scent than the regular one - it's Mandarin Mango. It smells good, but I prefer the original one. I really love that colorful glass, though!
Your job is to accept the lesson, love the person,
Crazy About a Woman
We use this mind to process all the data that our senses send us. It is the raw data before our emotion or logic or ego has had time to influence it.
I digress. I'm trying to tell a boot camp story!!!!
Replace the lid.
Music Marketing – The right and wrong amounts of promoting and social media promotion for a gig – LW Music Consulting YouTube Video –
The point is: you all LOST, except for the person who WON (the winning image will be published tomorrow). These are the eight runners-up, failures all, whose pathetic attempts at creativity deserve naught but our mockery and derision.
His first game, Durocher said to Mays: “Son, your batting third and playing center field.” That game, Mays hit a home run that Durocher described thusly: “I never saw a fucking ball leave a fucking park so fucking fast in my fucking life.” His entire career followed the trajectory of that first home run. Wish I would have been there to see some of it. This book helped bring a legend to life.
One thing I noticed about the organizers, though, was how they kept trolling for new speakers even after the deadline for signing up had passed. Long after. And how the schedule kept getting more compact. How I was originally slotted into Section 18 of Chapter 1, Molecular Oncology of Breast Cancer but on the final final schedule I was advanced to Section 4 of said Chapter. Other Chapters simply disappeared altogether.
Hold you
An exhibit at the Museum of modern art in New York.
Karma is the concept of "action"… understood as that which causes the entire cycle of cause and effect.
A giant black cat,
From her incredible vintage paper wreaths to her altered recipe cards
Thank you, gir.
It's been a while since my last post on the stays. I actually sewed the binding already a long time ago but now I've got two panels of the lining left to sew to the underside of the stays and then I'll be finished. I hope to do it next weekend, if not earlier. Anyhow, I thought I should write a post about IMATEX here because I just noticed it's working again! I don't know if it has been for some time already or if you all have noticed it before but here's a link to the page. It's great the English search actually works as well!
Yet I still haven’t sat down and written. I know a lot of the changes I want to make to my paranormal detective story that I wrote for NaNoWriMo last November and I feel the flavour that I need to bring to a rewrite/edit but still no go on the actual doing.
BONUS ENTRY: If you “LIKE” OCL on Facebook, you’ll get a bonus entry (as long as you tell us you did it) ~ if you've already "liked" us, let us know that too!
"I'm from Ireland," replies the second man.
ü A switch or some ways of ignoring QC metal detection checks Actually, our metal detector only detect metals under detection interface, if system go to other interface, although conveyor belt is running, but metal detector didn’t detect goods, so it is the same as Switch you mentioned.
This means that with the 37p increase from the taxman, a 20 pack of tobacco cigarettes is now 85% more expensive than e-cigs.
I learned quite a number of things in this experience, one of them is that making cake for large portion is very different than making a small one. I converted each ingredients needed but the result was different for some reason. I was so scared that the taste would get impacted and that it wouldn't taste as good as I wanted to be, but my worries didn't come true. Yes, it tasted different than the small version I usually make and I hoped that it would be better, but as soon as I got a lot of people going to the kitchen asking for seconds, I could start breathing peacefully :). I even heard that some people are going around the tables after the reception to find more unopened favor (the macaron), yay! Mission accomplished!
Foremost among them is the fact that the labels “pro” and “anti” are misleading. While there are people who are anti-enhancement, there are very few (if any) people who are unqualifiedly pro-enhancement. Instead, there are people who are anti-anti-enhancement, i.e. who believe enhancement is permissible, or sometimes okay. Continuing with the absolutist “pro” and “anti” labelling leads to a perpetual slaying of straw men.
He moved Laverne out of the way, then stuck the yardstick into the other end of the cabinet. The mouse ran toward me and got past me. SH jumped up and chased the mouse. It ran toward the laundry room, but he trapped it with the yardstick. I covered my hand with the handkerchief, then gently closed it over the mouse. I held it close to my face so I could see. It stuck its tiny little mouse head out of the handkerchief.
Call them whatever you want but add them to your shopping list. These small, reddish-brown, rounded beans are delicious and so good for you. They have a strong, nutty, sweet flavor and work great in stews or salads.
I felt I had to get this review out of the way. I know my first three posts will be logged down with the last three franchises, but I can’t help but get it out of the way. These series’ are just not as good as their predecessors, Voyager being no exception.
Upending someone’s world and then running and hiding is a precise mark of gutlessness. And who’s comfortable being ride or die for a coward? And loyal to a menace? If you answer “me! me!” then what does that make you in the end?
Otherwise this weekend...
New Albany-Floyd County Education Association
OWNER HAS SAID SELL TODAY – I WANT AN OFFER AND LETS NEGOTIATE.
fennel seed - 1 tsp (powdered)
Mr Anwar also revealed that just after the conclusion of the trial, on Christmas eve, his laptop had gone missing from his office The lawyer asked the audience to consider that no money or other items were stolen and asked who could have been interested in the contents of a laptop containing all of his files relating to Tommy Sheridan? The computer has never been recovered.
5. Talk to your small group, bible study or youth group about The Justice Summit.
4) It is NOT religious. Prayer is very casual, as stressed by recruitment guy.
David Storey(1933) wrote of the futility of life. Storey was a painter and novelist as well as a playwright and wrote the screenplay for the British Social Realist film version of his play This Sporting Life(1960).
Amazon has become a primary market for book sellers and self-published authors. Writers can promote and sell their books on the site without ever having to be published in print. It has even allowed a few writers to rise from obscurity to the ranks of national, best-selling authors - all without the help of a publisher. Search marketing can help you to promote your book, helping to get it noticed by more readers to increase sales.
That means it’s harder to track where the sludge is being spread, and also lets it be applied at higher levels, Reilly said. Environmentalists find that highly concerning given the Walkerton water tragedy and outbreaks — some deadly — of E. coli, salmonella and Listeria.
In this era, with many people for the first time being able to maybe afford a house with a garden, a car, a washing machine, a foreign holiday, perhaps even sending their children to newly expanding universities, many became convinced that, if allowed more freedom and relieved from the burdens of tax and regulation, their life could be even better. This increase in individual wealth and freedom saw many people who would have previously voted Labour turning to the Conservatives at the end of the 1970s. Labour politician Tony Benn even commented in 1971, “The individual escape from class into prosperity is the cancer which is eating into Western European Social Democratic parties.”
Part Twenty five
Happy Hump Day everyone! We've made it half way through the week. I'm pretty excited because I finally convinced my boss to provide some training to get me a little bit caught up with technology changes. It's been since 2002 since I've had any serious technical training. It's been since 2005 since I've had any real education courses of any kind. I hope this will lead to more training/education that will help me become better at my job!
The Plot: In the remnant of a shattered satellite, far above the ruined planet Earth, Steven Taylor and Oliver Harper are dying. As time runs out, they face their pasts … and a secret long kept is revealed. The borrowed time is elapsing, and they realize they are facing an enemy that cannot be defeated. The cold, hard facts of science.
So, Merry Fucking Christmas, children! Welcome to Uncle Franko's blog where we tell the shit like it really is. Approved for your use by The Blog Readability Test algorithm and the half-wits who cobbled that stupid shit together while they were stoned on something truly mind-altering.
Morgana - Fire Brick
1 didgeridoo of crafted PVC
Me: “Babies do not grow from sperm. They grow from eggs that are fertilized by sperm.”
Farah Khan is one of the very few directors currently working in Bollywood who is making our kind of masala movie. We loved Main Hoon Na and since her next project, Tees Maar Khan, is about to release it seems fitting to start our Christmas silly season with one of the last great masala films we saw in the cinema – Om Shanti Om (OSO).
T: you're gonna sing?
The true test of a person’s spiritual life and character is not what he does in the extraordinary moments of life, but what he does during the ordinary times when there is nothing tremendous or exciting happening. A person’s worth is revealed in his attitude toward the ordinary things of life when he is not under the spotlight (seeJohn 1:35-37 and John 3:30). It is painful work to get in step with God and to keep pace with Him— it means getting your second wind spiritually. In learning to walk with God, there is always the difficulty of getting into His stride, but once we have done so, the only characteristic that exhibits itself is the very life of God Himself. The individual person is merged into a personal oneness with God, and God’s stride and His power alone are exhibited.
Second, then, she went to the source. The quote came from a sermon entitled, “The Drum Major Instinct,” in which he criticized the natural but immature and selfish desire--on the part of individuals, groups, and entire nations-- “to be important, to surpass others, to achieve distinction, to lead the parade.” (As in many other cases, the image was not original; he borrowed it from a liberal white minister.) It was early in 1968, but (though he did not know it) late in his life, and he spoke of how he would like to be remembered: as someone who helped others, who fought for justice and against war. So:
"Will you feel lonely in Japan?"
The Mercury lacks critical purpose and it shows. But keep the faith. Things are going to get warmer and more interesting as time wears on.
At the end she suggested that people draw up (artistically, if they like) their own personal "Happiness Model" using the 3 charts that she showed us. It was done with concentric circles, the middle one being the "Being" Values, the second one being the "Having" values, and the outside circle being the personality strenghths. I loved the way she said that these strengths can become "SUPER POWERS"!! :) She also talked about Radical Forgiveness, The Work (by Byron Katie) & The Journey (a transformation & healing work by Brandon Bays, cancer survivor).
SPECIAL AWARD
While a stunning Khmer girl beside us had her hair back-combed, crimped and clipped for her real pre-wedding shoot, we, as barangs, understandably received a swifter treatment. Fake hair was applied. Out came all manner of pieces, from giant buns to curly ponies. The blond and brown curly one was mine. Like I said, I had reddish hair, and it’s straight too. A quiff was coiffed, a wig clipped and a tiara, rather painfully, stuck to my head.
_____I have some friends who don't have a Facebook profile. We have nothing to talk about.
So, whew. That’s really all I can say about life right now. Teaching is my life. I’m ok with that, I mean I did train four years in order for it to be so. In the words of one of the guys I graduated it (who is former army) “I mean the military is a lifestyle, but no where near that as teaching.” One day I’ll grow out of it, I’m sure. I’m still a rookie, you know. I’ll grow into it.
VIDAL: We have had talks in the last two or three years. As soon as
- Sean Connery as Gerber
3 tablespoons all-purpose flour
This week I thought I’d give you an impression of last week’s weather. Blue skies, sun, snow and freezing. Quite nice actually.
Apply in writing detailing previous experience of managing public art installations and how you meet the responsibilities as detailed above. Please include how you would approach the contract, an estimated number of days, your daily rate and expenses and your proposed timescales to deliver the project by mid September 2012. You may include a CV, maximum 3 sides of A4. (Pdf files are preferred to avoid compatibility/formatting issues.)
Sustainability is more than just a simple allocation of resources. It is more than keeping a record of who does what when and where or diagrams of use. It is more than communication. It is more than politics or the circular arguments of observation. It is about co-existence. It is about understanding our place within a greater context. Our concept of co-existence has been so externalized into our systems of religion–see ‘the greater good’–and communication–see facebook–or entertainment–see video games–that there is a new phenomenon developing. We now must make the choice about what we do and do not sample as a specie. In much the same way the book was once a luxury of the wealthiest in our societies, so our current systems of entertainment and communication have become. What will you choose to participate in during your lifetime?
Socialist Francois Hollande has declared victory in France's presidential election, railing against austerity measures and urging national unity after a bitter campaign against Nico
“We debated how best to put many hours of wear time on the critical bearing components of our rocket propellant piston pump, that are subject to significant wear and tear,” said Dan DeLong, XCOR Chief Engineer. “This particular motorcycle, the Triumph Street Triple, develops about the same horsepower and has the same cylinder arrangement as the liquid oxygen and kerosene fuel pumps for the Lynx suborbital spacecraft. That makes it ideal for a long-life pump test platform. The bike is much less expensive to operate than the full up rocket pump test stand. We’re adding hours of run time each ride, not just minutes.”
8.Jaybird Coleman / I'm Gonna Cross The River Of Jordan
(Disclaimer: No, I’m not saying all high-end, hardcore raiding guilds are stuck up and/or snooty. But ask anyone on Runetotem if they remember the guild “tys” and you’ll see why it was such a point of contention. For a while, the competition on our realm wasn’t just about progression, but to see who could be bigger asshats, too.)
As March comes to an end, so does Endometriosis Awareness Month. Endometriosis, though quite unknown to many, is one of the most common gynecological disorders with about 5.5 million women affected in North America alone. Endometriosis is basically a condition in which cells lining the womb grow in other areas of the body causing various symptoms such as very painful periods and cramps, intestinal pain, chronic pain in the pelvic area and lower back, pain during and after sex, and infertility. Endometrial cells may grow and implant on the ovaries, the lining of the pelvic area, the bowels, the rectum, the bladder, the appendix, and in extreme cases other organs throughout the body. Full story.
Now, there are two people I need to thank.
At least, she hoped it was an illusion.
After they made the stone soup, did they remember to take out the stone before they ate it? I sure hope so. It’s not really mentioned, but they must have. If one of them had choked on it, the story would have had a whole new meaning. But the tramp offers to give his magic stone to the old woman and she gratefully accepts. So it couldn’t have been lost somewhere at the bottom of the pot. That stone could have been the original Bay Leaf. Sorting out this kind of thing in my mind is no doubt what has given me grey hair and wrinkles and restless nights of sleep deprivation wishing things like bay leaves had never been invented. Or maybe cooking itself. Why can’t we just wash things off and eat them raw? We’d all sleep better.
EMMA is graduating from UND with her Masters on May 14th! She has had a very busy year of research, writing, teaching at UND, working at Starbucks and teaching tennis. We are planning to drive up to Grand Forks for the celebration on Sunday, May 15th. David and Emma will celebrate 3 years of marriage in July!
Eventually my husband finished school with another two degrees and obtained employment. I LOVED my job, but MISSED my kids. Time to come back home. It was excruciating to leave to say the least, but I still have some great friends that I’ve been able to keep in touch with. Not to mention all the mad stamping skills I was able to develop and take with me.
I also believe in agency, or as most people would be familiar with it, “free will.” I don’t like the term “free will,” because it implies that we have more control over our lives than we actually do. Most people are not free, and their will is inherently limited by their circumstances and opportunities, so what people have is not “free will,” but the ability to act in the world. That’s what “agency” means, being able to respond to the world.
God convinces him. Later on in the story Gideon has a whole slew of men ready to go to battle. But God wants to shift the odds. After thinning out the crowd by sending home guys who were afraid (22,000 of them took off—oh crud), he has Gideon bring the last of the men to the water – “Separate those who lap the water with their tongues as a dog laps…”
Why won't this work? Regardless of how much better IE9 is than previous iterations, people make up their minds on these things and they stay there. When you have a reputation for sucking, people don't forget that.
Who seeks to honor the Lord in all she does,
- Anne Rice
He turned for a moment and she got a full frontal of that perfect face. She smiled hoping to catch his eye and make the sight of his face last a bit longer as it was such a rare treat, something made him look up and he did smile holding her gaze for what felt like eternity. Then the photocopier finished scanning and he turned back taking his papers and returned to his desk.
So today I want you to meet Ayn. As of today she’s been away from her dad for 103 days. So what did he do? First question that comes up right, well he didn’t beat her, or sexually assault her; she wasn’t locked up in a room, neglected or the like. Her dad isn’t a drug user or drunk, but in the eyes of CPS he cannot possibly be able to handle 3 kids all by himself. So they “lightened his load” and took his daughter from him. She is in a foster home that does not properly care for her and pays a 15yr old to watch and administer “medication” to her.
Now, it’s almost here.
I am just busy with work and fun things.
When I heard about this dupe for Lippmann's Glitter in the Air, I searched high and low. I searched in two states and in MANY stores. Finally last night, my searching was rewarded. One for me, one for a friend.
I'm going to end the second part of the story here. I think his comment says enough about him.
I have started to get a sense of the disillusion myself with my hospital visits. People are confused, weary, no longer interested. What is needed, deep down, are saints. Holy priests, holy sisters, holy lay faithful, holy everyone. Perhaps it is most challenging to be a priest right now because of the scandal and the many struggles we continue to face. But as I told a couple ladies from the south, that is stateside, it is also an amazingly exciting time to be a priest. There is much to be done and much grace there to do it with.
Total box office gross: $115-1120 million
Catherine Middleton, Duchess of Cambridge, aka Kate Middleton, continued the run of recent royal festivities whilst her husband was away on military duty in the Falkland Islands as she set out to greet and charm the Irish guards and show her St. Patrick’s Day pride at a ceremonial military parade held at Mons Barracks in Aldershot, England, on Saturday (March 17, 2012).
JUSTICE GINSBURG: It would be hard to argue, Mr. Hungar, that it makes no sense, but it made sense to Cardozo and Judge Rich.
2) Guilt – Things are going to drop. Things are going to fall; and when your relationship with God is based on the practice of these things you will feel overwhelming sense of guilt for not keeping up with them.
useful in a plodding
It’s Just One Bullet (10)
The novel focuses on Ben Harper and his fearless friends who, after going out of bounds on a ski resort leave search and rescue teams with a chilling challenge on their hands. Whilst the search party hunts for clues to their location, Ben and his friends employ teamwork and initiative to overcome a series of thrilling dangers.
“My Groovy Girl,” Bruce said. “Yep, that’s it. My Groovy Girl.”
Fortunately, Jerry’s pretty good at his job. And since Tom Haskell runs the sheriff’s office and the drug-protection racket, Jerry doesn’t see much of a moral dilemma. That is, until he starts thinking about getting out of the trade, and then things get complicated fast. For starters, Jerry’s girl Maggie flees the state after learning about a disturbing diagnosis tucked inside Jerry’s psych report.
Then I covered the entire filter with the last color, which in this case was Frosted Juniper. It will stick to the Versamark where there was no powder before.
So the question I have is: why include these things? Neither film is in any way exploitative about their use of prostitution, certainly not at all to the extent we think about these things after the excesses of sex in film in the 70s. But it doesn’t exactly feel like a giant step forward for women when the path to freedom from a traditional, domestic lifestyle immediately falls face-first into turning tricks. Can that really be a proper, empowering choice for these women? It’s complicated, because they do indeed show growth, and it’s not like people taking control of their sex lives (especially in the more repressive situations presented in these movies) are necessarily bad. And the movies are otherwise actually quite rich in the kind of complex portrayals of women that would put 99% of most films today to absolute shame.
Onam sees Keralites welcome the king with elaborate flower decorations and festivities that spans several days.
BIKE THE SEAWALL AT STANLEY PARK – Sunday, May 27th
It was fun being The Old Man and serving as co-producer of the production. And Heidi Dotson wrote another amazing script with venerable old story being narrated by the cutest cow you ever did see.
"Sexual commodification is an important part of high fashion today." Elizabeth Semmelhack
But Norse Alchemist, surely you remember that it was the Arabs who gave us our numerals, Algebra, and preserved Alchemical texts.
What started with many record and near record counts has slowly found itself right where things should be. Typical first arrivals are now occurring when many did last year, especially for neotropical migrants. With the persistent cold, a few are now appearing a little late, or in small numbers when present. Take this morning’s first Baltimore Oriole of the season. Some south winds would have had many more through by now. Eastern Kingbirds have also yet to be seen, but should have arrived this week. The good side to the story is that we’re in that window where the next warm breeze should bring in some great migrants to up the diversity count!
I better get my boy into some boxing classes.
That's about it ! What have you been up to lately ?
So you may have to eat humble pie if your exit remarks are vicious and harmful to the reputation of the company. I can’t imagine Greg Smith getting a job at Goldman Sachs again, unless he buys the company.
Akshayananda: Nitai. Nitai dasa.
Nikolay Medtner
Kyla - Design has value in all sectors, but is most measureable in commercial and hospitality. Innovative spaces foster word of mouth, which market a business long after the guests, clients or customers have left. A well-planned, well-executed interior contributes to the success and profit of any business, and should be cohesive with a brands identity.
We had an end-of-the-year celebration at my house for all the co-op moms last week. It was sooo much fun! We got to enjoy ourselves without our little kiddos running around, talk, laugh- and had an absolutely wonderful time of sharing about our experiences and joys and fun memories of the year. It was a total blast!
Are you the same person that you were ten years ago? Do you still look upon things the same way that you did ten years ago? Looking back, think of the things that you used to consider to be good in your life. Has your opinion of these things changed? Has your opinion shifted with time?
Hi Everyone! Chassity here, and I'm so happy to be visiting my friend Natalie's blog today. I don't have to tell you all how great she is, I think you know. But I'm so happy to have connected with her in this big blogging world. Better yet, we only live 20 minutes from eachother :)
The basic sauce is ready. This can be preserved.
I'm going to design a plant tag for each of the transplants that goes off to a new home that will have all of the plant's information PLUS a link to that page so that people can dork out on their plants and also maybe stay in touch after the fact (and let me see their tomatoes - PORNY).
One of my favourite programmes is the BBC series shares the title of this blog post: Who do you think you are? What can be more intriguing than to find out that Boris Johnson is related to a Georgian king (now I know who he reminds me of with his generous chins!) or that J K Rowling's waiter grandfather won a French military cross for bravery in World War I? No wonder she writes about courage against the odds. Other History Girls have already mentioned the influence their own family history has on the themes they include in their books. The past, especially that of our own kindred, feels so much ours almost as if they had left it to us in their wills.
Work to do. Errands to run. Time to rest.
Maybe the lesson is this: Not everyone can be helped. They have to want to be helped. This is true for addiction, right? I don't know. Do any of you see a moral of the story here? DIYers - have you ever felt frantic while making color selections? Designers - have you worked with clients like this? How did you help them? Or are some people just impossible to help?
You can also visit The Bug Blog and see what the rest of the Design Team did - talk about out of this world Inspiration! WOW!
An Interlude….
Sometimes you may walk around with a bunch of friends, or grab some food and head for a nice party place. Sometimes you may lock yourself up in your room crying over some stupid small fight with one of your friends, but not realize its just to insignificant to pay attention to. ‘Don’t make a mountain out of a mole hill’. Don’t you hear that from people a lot? Isn’t it the tinniest little talks that make a lot of difference to our perspective and priorities? Why don’t we change that? Why does it always have to be the other way around rather than that which is required?
It is not for the beginner on the spiritual path, for whom it would probably seem little more than a collection of platitudes and pretty pictures – there is no deep investigation of the ways to achieve the promised self-growth. But it may be just what is needed for someone returning to a spiritual practice they have let slip in recent months. Or for the jaded palate that has run through all the staple foods of the mind, body, spirit bookshelves; and simply wants to focus on raising their vibration and reminding themselves of things they may have lost sight of. This is a beautiful book, full of uplifting sentiments, but what you get out of it will mirror what you put into reading it.
11.The Rhumba Blues
Please forgive me for the lack of posts so far. The switch has not gone as smooth as I planned.
Sentiments from Technique Tuesday
Okokokokokokokokokokok.
RSV-2CE:
As the two spend the summer together raising orphaned cougar cubs, Brigitta still can't be sure of his true identity. But then again, since her grandparents' death, her father's sudden urge to give away all their possessions and become a shaman, and her own awkward transition from girlhood into a young woman, she isn't sure of anything. What is the truth? More importantly, can she accept it?
By this these angels from an evil sprite ;
I won't post the recipe just yet. The recipe still needs tweaking :)
-Mention another girl that you’re interested in, make sure you are kind of interested in that girl cause she’s want to see a follow through. It’s great if it’s a friend of hers cause you can ask her advice. Then the message is loud and clear that you are not into her but into someone else. It will break her heart but you don’t bear witness to that and you don’t have to have an awkward conversation.
FAMILY VALUES: Perfect for family viewing, as you’d expect.
All sensible and caring people must do anything possible to condemn this Rabbi’s statements. But even more than that, we must work to make sure that people with this type of flippant attitude regarding verbal/physical abuse and assault and religious extremism not have any involvement in guiding Jewish children or their parents. Because when those “poor children” are turned off by what is presented to them as a soulless, uncaring, and extremist religion and their clergy not protecting them from abuse, no one will have to “tell you why.”
It may be that taking time for beauty — whether natural beauty or created beauty – is pointless, but still worthwhile. David Orr offers this point of view in Beautiful & Pointless: A Guide to Modern Poetry:
But I will never let go of your heart
Bord Gais Eireann, Alternative Energy, Deal Details 9
The ancient Gnostics claimed to be guardians of the secret teachings of Jesus, teachings that were lost when Gnosticism was defeated. Formal issues of apostolic succession aside, no modern Gnostics can claim to perpetuate those teachings in unaltered form, because the chains of transmission have been lost. Even the scriptures that have been recovered – as fascinating as they may be – retain an opaque quality, because the original interpretive keys are absent.
Claiming Christianity here in India’s Orissa State means persecution and brutal beatings. Both men have the scars to prove it. Kanhar has an eight-inch scar along his right side; Kata sports a hairless, jagged line above his right ear where his head is caved in from a beating.
This is "I want to brag about me family" post. :)
"Go on." The old man gave the dog a shove. "I have no use for you anymore," he said in a gruff voice. "Get going now!"
“Nothing is more precious than independence and liberty.”
This one's a little 5x7 box canvas- I'm so chuffed with how it's turned out. The background is painted with semi opaque acrylics, the heart are watercoloured and glazed/ semi glazed. It's lovely and bright.
This is my 2nd painting that I entered into the Degas Project Exhibit at Greater York Dance on 3524 E. Market St. in York. The exhibit will be in place until June 5. If in the area, please drop in to see all the paintings that 30 York Art Association artists have in place. If you have any questions, or wish to purchase, contact PAT If you wish to see more of my works, please visit my website at:
Do not show off your rebound relationship. We see this one almost too often, don’t we? Find a richer/hotter boyfriend/girlfriend, take them out to places you know your ex frequents and then do unspeakable things to show off. Never works to get your ex back, because this way your ex can see how cheap and vengeful you are.
As we all know. This has nothing to do with security. It has everything to do with control. The next step is the scanners at the bus stops and train depots. Note that destination is required to get on the transportation. We have truly arrived at “papers please.”
Pro make up will always look multi-tonal with different dimensions in different lights. This is because a few different shades correctly blended create the tones you want. 3 or 4 colours can make an eye look mesmerizing. No one wants one block colour on their lid on a special night, for work yes, hot date - NO!
Blog and Photographs By: Nick Tobar
just posted some notes on shoppable media- If You want to here me speak and share more then Vote at http://j.mp/I0hHXN #makethestage @internetweek.look for " This Ain’t Your Mama’s Dress Shop A How to Fashion Tech Guide for Designers!" Register and press that thumbs up button EVEN IF WE ARE AT THE TOP! every vote counts and we want to share our knowledge!
She finally utters her first words
February Saturday 4th - 10am to 4.pm - Serendipity Patchwork & Quilting, Seale-Hayne, Newton Abbot, DevoN TQ12 6NQ
(Sometimes having someone else figure out the measurements is worth the money, especially since I know I will be sewing this pattern quite often.)
FB: And the Negroes – weren’t they brought here from Africa as slaves and later emancipated by white people?
I decided to branch out and read the “master of horror”. I’ve seen parts of the movie but as usual it’s sometimes more fun to read the book. The book was surprisingly short and only took me about two hours to finish =) I was at first confused by King’s formatting on the physical page. He uses parenthesis which I liked the personal thoughts in them but I was a bit confused at first. And I liked the use of news articles interspersed in between the prose but in the beginning I was confused again because I wasn’t sure of the format. I did enjoy the suspense that it created although at times I wasn’t sure I liked so much foreshadowing.
Gymnastics has indeed changed over the years.
Disraeli
John Hartman - drums
We have a busy couple of weeks ahead of us so there will be plenty to post about very soon. Logan's cardiology appointment is next week (we need some prayers), preschool graduation, our wedding anniversary and hopefully a family vacation.
Sorry for the short blog – I should be up early on Sunday to get to all of the Sunday links.
Week 12-vs Houston Texans-12:30pm-November 22, 2012*
It wasn’t the usual brief clip but they actually spent about 3 minutes on this story, completely slamming this kid and his family. I honest to god thought Kate Campbell must be sleeping with the right people. And now tonight it has gone to air again and yet again my heart started pumping and I started to rant and rave at no one before taking it out on a friend on Twitter.
High Fantasy has its basis a kind of idealized society, and most High Fantasy plots revolve around a threat to that society. One or more of its members, often the lowliest must face up to the threat and return the world to its natural state. (You’ll noted that this is a good capsule summary of LOTR). The threat is usually personified evil in the form of a sorcerer, warlord, or unchained demon. High Fantasy allows a lot of scope to explore character and relationships.
Everyone apart from tola was told to go; he had to give a statement to police. Raah; idon’t even remember what happened?
UPDATE: The lovely MATT PRESTON himself read my blog yesterday and sent a message to me saying "What a stylish lad!"- so Mr.7 is now walking shoulders held so high they touch the moon and couldn't wait to go to school to tell everyone! And I'm just a little bit over the moon too!!!! (read JUMPING UP & DOWN IN HYSTERIA!!!!).
Was in two minds today whether to dander into town (one thing I haven't mentioned is that my motor's packed in). But I did as I reckon being a man of limited means and fewer prospects I will never leave the Bellshite, nor, in my lifetime, get to see the denizens herein getting their two-tone psyches so lavishly catered to by such a grand American extravaganza – the last big American extravaganza of its magnitude probably being WW2.
Y'all, I got super awe-fabu-wonder-credible news today! No, I didn't win an all-expense-paid 30-day vacation to the Caribbean on a pamper-the-hell-outta-me cruise that includes a scalpel-free full-body rejuvenation, complete with 50-year guarantee and an endless supply of Swedish massages with Sven the manscaped Viking, warm peanut butter crackies, and exotic, um, tingly sensation aromatherapy pleasuring oils. Oooooo, good guess though!
It will be interesting to see what the results are when it’s done slower, but I don’t think they will be bad or even less. And hey, at the end of it, it’ll be bathing suit season. Excellent plan, if I don’t say so myself.
Don't know what's wrong... but i hope it goes away soon! I have a full week this week! Giving English lessons, babysitting, internship, field trip Wednesday, classes, 3 exams... dang.
Some hide behind their egos. Some are silently afraid and they lead others to think their silence is an act of self-confidence. Some are proud, so they act constantly aggressive.
nor even the gods
9.Fake Problems-ADT
Oh yea, and there’s some passion
“There’s more pressure this year than last year,” Garcia said. “It’s hard to stay on top of the mountain.”
“And whosoever speaketh a word against the Son of man, it shall be forgiven him: but whosoever speaketh against the Holy Ghost, it shall not be forgiven him, neither in this world, neither in the world to come.”
I just HAVE to show this pic....this little sweetie is the "ring bearer" and he was just so stinkin cute I wanted to squeeze him! lol TFL
The rest of 2007 looks set to be really exciting for the tenor, he has tours lined up with Dame Kiri as well as Lesley Garrett and will be appearing at open air concerts all over the UK this Summer. One day the tenor from Reykjavik will fulfil his ambition to sing Otello at the Royal Opera House in Covent Garden. But right now he is an undiscovered gem whose debut album is a compelling mixture of ice and fire.
I really like the look of this McCovey. On the front you have a close up of Willie Mac and also a small picture of him in his follow thru HR swing. The back shows an action shot of Stretch sliding into home. My guess is this came from earlier in his career when he could actually run. It got to be painful seeing him lumber later in his career and he now can barely get around, walking with canes when he isn't in a wheel chair, due to numerous knee injuries. The back also is in Giant's orange which adds to the eye appeal.
"Over the next several decades, the Western United States and the semi-arid region from North Dakota to Texas will develop semi-permanent drought, with rain, when it does come, occurring in extreme events with heavy flooding. Economic losses would be incalculable. More and more of the Midwest would be a dust bowl. California’s Central Valley could no longer be irrigated. Food prices would rise to unprecedented levels."
Cry (if you feel like it)
Attributes: Agility-d8, Smarts-d8, Spirit-d10, Strength-d8, Vigor-d10
It is difficult to assess how individuals are doing financially these days. But the main indicators show that the Iranian economy is in a nose dive. Soon, there'll be shortages of basic items as the regime's power to purchase is dwindling. The recent wave of sanctions have had a devastating affect on Iran's currency as well. For instance, one US dollar is now equal to 20,000 Rial (Rial is Iran's official currency). A few months ago, a US dollar was around 11,000 Rial. (Every 10 Rial is 1 Toman which means a US dollar is around 2000 Toman). Technically Rial has lost more than 25% of its value in the past 2 weeks. An economic crash is all but inevitable in Iran now.
We played in Bbang around Hongdae in Seoul., Heavy in Daegu, and Budgie live club in Daejeon. They just know there was a compilation made in Gwangju, and that's all. Many bands are made and fading away. I think it's not a big deal to them. They just take a glance and see what they want. But I know catching someone's eyes is very hard. So we released our EP at the time when the compilation was released. But, still I don't think that they are staring at us. The best way to get an interest seems to be to participate in many project shows or do many concerts. So, I'm still looking for the shows that we can participate in.
It’s the summer of 2008. A young couple decides to buy an 800-square-foot apartment in a new condo building on the gentrifying outer edge of a fashionable Brooklyn neighborhood. The buyers go to close on the place, and as they’re signing away half a million dollars, the building’s developer, keeping a wary eye on the hovering lawyers, leans over and whispers something. There’s a second bathroom in the apartment, he says, one that does not appear on the floor plan—its doorway is concealed behind an inconspicuous layer of drywall. At first, the buyers think the developer is kidding. This is before the crash, near the peak of the market, and no one’s giving away a square inch. But the developer says no, he’s dead serious, just look. So a few days after they buy the place, the couple takes a sledgehammer to their wall. Like something out of House of Leaves—or a kind of architectural Advent calendar, in which various walls are knocked down at specific times of the year to reveal whole new rooms and corridors behind them—the building contained more space than its own exterior had indicated.
March 28, 2012 at 5:19 AM
A public playground and park is next door on Washington Street and Lafayette, called Underwood Park, named for the typewriter mogul, John Thomas Underwood (1857-1937), whose mansion once stood on this property.
with me feet together,
Unfazed by his encounter with Nicole (the thought her probably black panties pressing tightly against her creamy vulva no doubt still dancing around inside his head), Alex gives Lori "the keys to his kingdom." Unfortunately, Lori isn't quite ready to move in with Alex just yet, and politely rebuffs his offer (she does, however, accept the keys to his place). Shortly after Lori and her supercute haircut have left, Alex meets another neighbour, this time it's Roman (Dennis Embry), an affable poet who had a "I play bass in a Bauhaus tribute band on weekends" vibe about him. Wait a minute, poets aren't usually affable. What gives? It would seem that underneath Roman's friendly demeanor lies an ulterior motive.
After our poor luck car hunting, I noticed a particular car commercial on the radio, advertising something brand new and with a great warranty, for an amazing price. I did a little research, but never held out much hope for a brand new vehicle. I've never owned one, and I've never really wanted one. Everyone knows they drop in value the minute you drive them off the lot, right? But that warranty...wow. So, late one evening, after more driving (but no vomiting...can I get a hallelujah....), Eöl and I were sipping wine, looking at cars online. Hoping for the best, we filled out the online application at a dealership. The very next day, we drove off the lot in a BRAND NEW CAR. Oh. My. Soul. .
But about those rock stars…
1/4 red onion, sliced into half or quarter moons
My dad used to call me on Max's birthday and wish me a Happy father's day because that is the day I became a father. He would wish Lauren a Happy Mother's day for the same reason.
For many years I’ve owned this set of Batman Forever ceramic mugs. I have never used them for drinking, because that’d just be…weird. Their likenesses always bothered me – the only one who really looks decent is the Riddler. Two-Face looks more like Keanu Reeves than Tommy Lee Jones. If only there were some way of gee, I dunno…comparing the likenesses of the mugs to the actors themselves, but using faultless computer logic…
7) Beyond that there are many good ideas and I’ll need to look at them and decide on priorities.
Or put another way, “Listen you tax-evading, taverna-owning rabble, we’re on this Goddamn gravy train, and I’m not going to have you lot voting us off”. We still don’t know what George made of this, but we can guess. A Greek expert I contacted last night asserted that Mr Venizelos is not long for the world of Papandreou and his allies. One wonders if he’ll survive this morning’s Cabinet session in Athens.
In the blogisphere tradition I will open the floor to you, my faithful readers, to ask anything you like....it's question and answer time! Please post your questions in the comments and I will do a follow up post with all the glorious answers!
Also, the first two mornings after the quake, while still in Tokyo, I woke up and had never been so excited to open my eyes. The simple act of rising was a huge relief. Every time REM is over, and the brain starts waking the body up again, is a gift. The typical pessimists perspective is that everyday is one step closer to death. When in reality, it's another gift in a series of gifts we're given through our life if we just...keep waking up. Every day can be the catalyst for change, and putting something off until tomorrow might never happen. Just saying.
I. Hime-fy your bedroom!
I toss his head as I release him. His nose drips red from the force of my blow. Yet lust covers his face, eyes aflame with passion. As much as I hate the thought I would rather have him lust after me then want to kill me. Even if my uncle where to order him to, I don’t think he would have the hart.
If you recall from my post a couple of weeks ago, I decided to chase the last double-Q for my APDT Rally ARCHX title with Marge. I decided to enter only one day at a local trial, giving my checkbook a break and thinking we'd get it in only one shot. Part of me wanted the title, and part of me didn't want to completely rob Marge of Rally since she enjoys going to Rally trials so, so, much.
Do not miss the beauty of your life, or the life of others, as you round the corners. Don't hasten the clock as your day winds down.
techniques!
The pleasurable sensations having dissipated somewhat Ophelia retracted her hand, a move that was greeted by a ripple of polite applause and gentle murmurs of approval. Forcing open one strained and puffy eyelid apparently glued to its other half by some kind of sticky sleepy dust cement her brain managed to rationalise the painful shards of jagged light that came rushing in just then and realised that she was facing a semi-circle of spotty hoodie-types, all grinning at her in convincingly bemused teenage fashion. As she forced her eyelid open further she noticed for the first time a squawking mass of seagulls and, in between her and them, a teeming sea of black and grey-green bin bags interrupted here and there by the occasional fridge or oven with no doors or door hanging off, and realised with horror that she had spent the night on a landfill site once again, with no clue or memory of how she had got there. Some of those minicab drivers really must have it in for me, she thought, and without further ado rolled over in search of that elusive comfy spot and, incredibly, was asleep again in minutes.
“I’m perfectly serious, my dear. Obviously this is something that you would equate with vampires and such, but I can tell you now I am not a vampire or any such mythical creature. My interest in blood occurred when my wife and I were having sex actually. I was biting her neck and bit down to hard causing my teeth to break the skin. I have quite sharp teeth as it happens.” His dinner guests stared completely shell shocked. “Anyway so a trickle of blood ran down her neck so I brushed my tongue over the cut. In that moment I was in ecstasy. There I was making love to the most beautiful woman in the world and I was sucking the blood from the wound I had inflicted. It was heaven.
...i capture as much of it on camera as i can, because these days won't last forever.
Kacie is a natural connector, and for the past three years, she’s been meeting new people and deepening relationships through service. Her regular commitment to Game Night, which takes place at Bordeaux Hospital, and Bingo Party at J.B. Knowles has become part of who she is, and she’s loved every moment.
Brian Jones started the band (and came up with the name) only a few years earlier, and was the de facto leader. His original idea for the Rolling Stones was to cover the blues and boogie numbers by black American musicians he so loved. The novelty of white British guys playing soulful American classics was enough to get them a name. Brian was the top dog until Andrew started shaking things up by having Mick take the lead in their shows, and by encouraging Mick and Keith to start writing songs together. Brian, unfortunately, was slowly being left out in the cold.
Its innovative and visionary design has earned it many awards notably the Civic Trust Award, the Eternit Award, the Ambrose Congreve Award for Housing (in 1980) and the Veronica Rudge Green Prize for Urban Design from Harvard University. The Wall has also been placed on UNESCO's list of outstanding twentieth century buildings.
1. They imitate the real thing.
I hate the cold:
* Yesterday, an ANC member was stabbed several times by a number of suspended ANC members in Vryburg, North West. The victim was delivering suspension letters when he was attacked. Their suspension follows the disruptions of an ANC provincial conference held last month in Sun City.
Evidence presented in the court hearings alledged that on the night of the murder the men entered BDJ’s convenience store wearing masks and demanding money. One of them was armed with a shotgun.
舞 まい, mai = dancing; dance
I finally bit the bullet and gave it a go.
who will say
After the third and final boiling point in the microwave, take it out and place a small spoonful in a cup of cold water. Check to make sure the caramel has reached soft-ball texture. If it is slimy, or not setting it up, put back in the microwave for one more minute and check again. This process takes a little bit of practice, but in my experience caramel is a little forgiving!
So, we are having a pre-seasoned pork loin, lemon and garlic ( with a little Tony C's sprinkled on top)
As both boys in the photo are wearing a school uniform, Ms Yates said she expected that the school would be called upon to assist with her inquiries.A disturbing sidebar to the appearance of the photo on Facebook was the number of people who commented on it.
In PROPHECY, the theme of bones and death is pervasive and I use crypts and ossuaries as well as catacombs for scenes in the book. In the examples below, I use text from PROPHECY to fill in the categories of the setting thesaurus.
The Edge Daily published a surprising eyewitness report by its staff writer, Max Koh, who was covering the Bersih 2.0 march. In a blow-by-blow commentary, Max’s article traces his experiences during the historic 709 march.
“You’re looking over your shoulder, maybe a little nervous pulling into ports and stuff like that,” Chief Robin Guy said Tuesday on the ship, docked at Norfolk Naval Station.
I would suggest that you open one up and see.
I believe that the British National Party is the only hope for Heanor and her residents. The message of hate from ultra-left extremist outsiders should be discounted for what it is - interference in local decision making.
It is a shame that Cameron did not follow their chosen course in the spring, as had he exposed himself as a co-thinker of the drooling reactionaries who make up the " Taxpayers Alliance" he might have done far less well at the polls!
Tia was diagnosed with breast cancer on September 22nd, 2010. She's already had her 1st surgery and the bills will start rolling in. Her current financial situation could mean that further neccessary surgeries may be postponed. Please help by either donating directly to her fundraiser
Wearing them it will make me smile, and remember being 17 again.
Any other absolutist powers in all other Ministries should also be removed. This is a democracy and Malaysia’s showcase of 1800s laws and constitution are a blight on all Malaysians. Start with Section 377B which UN Sec, Gen Ban Ki Moon has made himself very clear on. What is the Bar Council doing about Section 377B and the earlier mentioned problems? Withdraw their degrees if they do not file a formal complaint to the UN on outdated laws!
Whether Joe intentionally made such a false claim to portray his service during Vietnam equal to that of Mielke’s, who served with the 82nd Airborne and was awarded a Bronze Star with ‘V’ device is known only to Joe. But, we called him on it and he corrected the misleading statement.
Some of the losses are as follows:
Can't believe when we get home, he'll be three. Ah ok Momma, keep it together...
6. In 6th grade, a new position in Student Council was created. It was Spirit Leader. That person would get to help do the morning announcements over the intercom and be the MC for teacher events. I didn't run for that position, but after the original person was forced to resign after getting suspended, I got elected. How? Well, everyone interested in the position had to get up in front of the rest of the Student Council and tell why they'd be a good candidate and then do something unique. I got up and got voted in unanimously after showing them my monkey impression. Not just the face (which alone is pretty impressive)....I jumped around and made monkey sounds. Yeah. I'm awesome.
Detroit Lions: B+
For example, the girls spent the weekend organizing all the earrings I had taken off when I discovered at my desk that the jangling was distracting me when writing and so tucked them in a little corner “out of the way”.
I used masking tape and acrylic paint on the background.
10-Do You Think It's Alright?
Right. where’s them pins…..
Please check this blog and their planners each night:
"This House is Haunted (by your memory)" is more upbeat in tempo, more in the style of R. Dean Taylor's 'There's A Ghost In My House," and other bleak but commercial pop tunes. Taylor pushed his rhythms in the direction of Motown, but the swamp stomp on this one means that Cymbal was hoping to find some grim C&W performer to take that darkness into the light.
As one who’s
People are dying because people can’t clear this one last hurdle. They can’t get past this one last thing, in the bible, about homosexuality.
North of Heartbreak
After removing the screen, he was hoisted through the open window. He walked over to the door and unlocked it to the cheers of mom, me and my fellow officer. He felt the hero that day and I was happy to play my part.
which I read religiously whenever I could find it. By the time
In a small bowl, place the water and sprinkle the gelatin over the top. Let the mixture stand for 3-4 minutes until the gelatin has thickened. Microwave for 20-30 seconds until the gelatin dissolves and the mixture is warm. Remove from the microwave and let the mixture cool to room temperature (don’t let it set up!). In a large bowl, whip the cream, sugar and vanilla until slightly thickened. While beating slowly, gradually add the cooled gelatin to the whipped cream mixture. Whip at high speed until stiff peaks form.
My friend went to Ho Chi Minh City in December with her husband. She told me that they tried many pho noodle soups at different places and they concluded that their favorite was pho at PHO24. So, the first pho I had was at PHO24. It hit the spot!! Then my husband’s friend who lives there told us about PHO2000. He said that the difference between PHO24 and PHO2000 was that PHO2000 used less MSG. I think that they are both good. I personally liked PHO2000 better. I liked the broth they make. I usually like to order Pho Ga (Pho Chicken) and the meat you get at PHO2000 is chicken breast and you get a lot. Price wise PHO24 and PHO2000 are about the same. They both can be found all over the city.
None of this is new – all through history there’s been a conflict over the control of how information is distributed. In early civilisations this was pretty simple – only certain people could read/write/chisel hieroglyphics so rulers could keep a close eye on them. And if malcontents daubed slogans on the walls of public places, not a huge number of people would see them.
I’ll wait while you think about that…
* Achtung! Superfluous warning posts, about high number of Alpine Skiing related posts, may now appear from time to time on this blog.
Each of Kristal's stamp sets benefit charity. At least $1 per stamp set goes to benefit the charity noted on the stamp set package. Kristal is donating to the following charities: Cancer Angels, Storefront Shelter for Homeless Children, Intrepid & Fallen Heroes, E. Glaser Pediatric AIDS Foundation, Doorways Shelter for Women & Children (Domestic Violence), Wayside House for Women, Camp Good Days & Special Times, Adopt a Classroom, and Autism Research Institute. Kristal will donate $1 for every stamp set sold, retail or wholesale to the charity noted; and over time believes this will add up to some wonderful miracles for these special people. So you can feel good that each time you purchase a K Andrew Designs art stamp set, someone around the country is receiving some good help!
Trademarks: Called everyone "Sam." Played mean tricks on Theodore "Beaver" Cleaver (e.g., changed his D- in math to a B+).
Everyone stunned at the force and extent of police reaction just because some had breached the barrier. Only at home were the aches and pains noticed and felt! Far worse though was the mental shock that our POLICE would endanger the lives of young and old. They knew the crowd was so dense that escape was extremely difficult. They wanted us to disperse so why trap people in the middle by firing tear gas from the front and from behind too? And why were they chasing after people trying to get away from the gas?
I want to dance with the wind.
I used one of my Sweet Pea stamps. I love the images. They are so pretty. I started my color scheme with the greens. I picked the greens I use the least - those ended up the YG91, 93, 95, 97, 99. I colored her dress. I really wanted to work on adding a lot of depth of color. So I made sure I went across the entire spectrum. Once I was done with that, I moved onto the Poppies. Those are red... OK... So I looked at my more orangey reds - R02, 05, 08 and colored them up. I added in the R29 and 39 on the edges. The yellow centers are Y15.
"It is particularly dangerous because you need to use both hands which clearly should be used to drive the car."
Obama signed the Bush tax cut extension that – in spite of its short window – could have given businesses a little security about the future. But then almost immediately after signing the extension he began to demonize it again and call for Marxist-style redistribution of wealth from the people who take all the risks to the people Democrats want to exploit for their votes.
So the next day, feeling a bit shell-shocked, we got back on the Inverness bus and came home :-(
Sample Training Workout:
The SGPC is considered a mini Parliament of the Sikhs. Only the Shiromani Akali Dal and other Sikh parties directly participate in these elections.The Congress, which is the main Opposition party in Punjab, does not participate in the SGPC elections directly.
That is, in essence, all that most people need to know to start to understand the cloud: cloud is a commercial model wherein you pay for a service, done as you need it to be done when you want it done without requirement for upfront investment or set-up fees: no purchases required! “Cloud computing” is a generic term for pretty much anything that involves delivering infrastructure or programs over a network (typically but not always the internet). Essentially a figure-of-speech, cloud is hosted IT systems, or managed and hosted services, or managed applications or IT outsourcing… any of the above, or others.
Please join me in thanking Amber Goble for joining us in the Tea Room last week as our Guest Designer and thank you also to Lea Lawson for joining us as our December Month-Long Special Guest Designer!
is a love letter
One day, Glenda, decided to use the grocery money for her ‘family’s needs’. When I got home from a night of particularly awful debauchery and needed vittles, my pantry was bare, with the exception of a handwritten note explaining she had a family emergency. Hence, she had sent the 3k Php to her daughter and her three children. If you come to the Philippines, you will soon realize there is ALWAYS a family emergency. They love to try to con foreigners into feeling sympathy for their plight. But if you do, they will only keep asking for more. So I fired her. She cried and protested at the door the following day. She even tried to break back into the condo a few days later. But I had already hired Shane. In the end, Shane nearly made me flee the country.
But nothing happened.
4. Were you named after anyone?
I think if we ever got the funding support, people would be blown out by what we would find. And I have another possibility—now this is something—I don’t know exactly quite how to play this, but I have some connections with the media for possibly doing some documentaries on it. There’s some strong interest.
3. San Antonio Rose
Additionally, I stumbled on another 'Janet' earlier this month. OF COURSE I bought it! It was through our locally grown farmer's market. My buddy Julie from Garden Delights was the seller. She is such a sweetie, she shared couple more! Lathyrus odora 'Janet Scott', Sweet Pea. I have 'Janet' growing next to Rebecca, so she can use the trellis as well.
With that thought in mind, Rachel then considered doing some stomach crunches or an exercise video. Maybe she'd do that Turbo Jam DVD she had ordered, but never opened.
Between Meyer, Asher and I, we had 7 medical appointments this week.
But, please, don't let my warning to discourage your desire of trying this recipe. Eat and run 2 miles around your neighborhood afterward.
We'll open the pool this week.
Eldest: You know mama, they carry their babies.
This just felt like something I needed to sit down and write, and get off my chest, but on a lighter note...Please tell me what you do to combat homesickness?
The green thread of river a mile below my boots.
CW: 171
Hmmm… it would appear I had a little more to say than just a question.
I'd be delighted to order any of these items for you (except the post it note!) and can have them delivered to your address in the UK. I'm committed to providing excellent customer service and am always happy to offer help and advice. To place your order, just send me an email or give me a call on 01280 820593.
Your “latests and greatests” give you the means to reach out and communicate with employees as well as prospects and customers – and probably on a daily basis; are you taking advantage of all of them? This type of engagement breeds customer and employee loyalty, long term sales and referrals. Pepper your communications plan across all channels with coordinated educational information and announcements as the means of giving them reasons to want to identify themselves with you and the brand of your business.
So I had fun!!! Great book too! Love all of her writings.
My lips tremble
Over the past two days, I have re-upped all links from October- November of 2006.
Yes, I have heard some online say that God would receive Tom White into his Holy Presence in spite of the fact that he killed himself after he committed the sin of molesting a young girl. These people need to take the blinders off their eyes and repent of their own sin of agreeing with wickedness. “Not all our idols go to heaven”. Many LIES are being said at funerals!
Businesses should examine their needs before choosing a scheduling program. Businesses may have a few personnel, or a large staff; businesses may have one location, or multiple locations. Resource planning software auto-generate employee shifts which save time. Also, programs which produce easy-to-understand reporting help managers to spot trends quickly, so that they may address potential issues.
5. H-E-B Pure Cane Sugar Soft Drinks, 12-pack, $1.99* (through 2/15/11)
A phrase that has appeared so often in our media is “ethnic cleansing”. It may sound good but definitely is not. By whose standards is ethnic cleansing carried out? Sadly, they think they are right and will fight to the death to see it accomplished. Saul, in his unsaved state, was seeking to cleanse Judaism of this new faction.
Put all salad ingredients in large bowl and mix well. Make dressing in blender. Pour over salad a little at a time and toss and serve immediately.
While you were away.
Now, it’s important to look at the relationships between the 2005 data and the 2011 data. There was a less compelling relationship between the predictive data and the crash results for several reasons. There were far fewer crashes (especially fatalities) between then and now. There were (likely) far greater tickets issued over the past three years as states were looking to increase revenues to offset other losses in the down turned economy.
I might never have met you. I might never meet you. But I know that you are wonderful and you don't need to change in any way that doesn't make you happy. You don't need to be anyone but who you are, or dream any dreams but your own. So the next time YOU feel the B*tSh*t Crazy Lady taking you over? Remember that. Preserve and protect the special thing that makes you who you are, no matter what. And be happy.
* I am being MTF-centric here because I am more familiar with that situation.
1 till
I haven't written a Session post in ages, almost two years it seems, so when I saw the call for this months Session topic, Cooking with Beer, I reckoned it was time as, after all, I cook with beer as much as I can. Anything stew-like normally gets a dose of beer thrown in, usually on a one for the pot, one for me basis. I don' keep very good track of what I try, but on some dishes I make regularly, I've tried all sorts of beers in different quantities to find the right balance. Chili is one of those dishes I make with great regularity, and let's face it, is there a beer geek who doesn't have a chili recipe that includes beer? I'll be surprised if this is the only Session post with a chili recipe! Last New Year's Eve was the right moment for my last batch, but with some tweaks on my normal recipe to make it a bit special for a party. The recipe, or an approximation of it, is below.
That helped me find myself amongst the music and the rhyme that enchants you there
This trip being no exception, we have to be here in Victoria an hour early for warmups before the game starts.
4. Pour the pasta into a greased 9x13-inch baking pan. Top with the Parmesan cheese. Bake until the top is golden and the cheese melts, about 25 minutes. Allow the pasta to rest for 5 or so minutes before serving.
Peter Hitchens is getting his knickers in a knot over the fact that the winning team on University Challenge: Manchester University seemed unfamiliar with that old stalwart of Autumn: Keats’s ‘Ode to Autumn’. Could that have something to do with technological advances which mean that people have to specialise much earlier than they used to? And wasn’t it Einstein who said that only monomaniacs ever get anything done?
Today, busy couples are not only looking for the absolute best venue for their wedding but also one that provides help with selecting additional services and overall wedding planning. Mission Valley Resort offers that and more. This beautiful local hotel offers numerous sought out features as well as wedding planning staff dedicated to that specific role. Let them help you with decisions to make the process of planning your wedding stress free while keeping the costs down.
However, it's more than just your usual, run of the mill brewer event where you roll up to the pub, shake hands, shoot the breeze and sample one or, if you are lucky, a couple of the Brewer's Fayre. This, instead, is an off the scale, extra special event where a dozen of the taps at the Cask have been taken over by a gorgeous infestation of lovely keg and cask beers from one of the most exciting breweries in the UK at the moment.
Swell'd Washington's, Jefferson's, Lincoln's sails.
points, and now ...
Front Squat/Split Jerk 1-1-1-1-1-1-1
I want you to hold your head up
The six-point plan, drawn up by Kofi Annan, calls for the withdrawal of heavy weapons and troops from population centres, humanitarian assistance, the release of prisoners and free movement and access for journalists.
In short: I likes me a nice meal at a swanky restaurant every now and again, price be damned. You know: just the chance to go out and indulge in this particular type of art form/theater.
John Cougar Mellancamp. I’ve lost track, what does he officially go by these days?
But soon I'll think, what the hell was I thinking.
CHRISTMAS PRESENT!
Hope: Direction? Yes, I think this is definitely the right direction for us.
Ninety-year-old boxing trainer Al Silva thought his hearing had deserted him again.
“The wash needs to be started right away,” her mom said as she busied herself with the dishes in the kitchen sink.
- O – Obedient to be unified as one body (the church) and to serve others (the members of the body).
Visit them at they website www.gowanusnursery.com. Then go check them out. From what I observed, this nursery's aim is to fill the void that The Terminal Market and Home Depot create with their limited offerings. So if you are looking to load up on Petunias, you may still need to trek over to those places. But if you are looking to create that stunning rock garden, for example, this is definitely the place to go.
Churning over words, prose, phrases, sentences, hoping for the connect, when words collide and make sense...or not. The lady inspiration dances in the distance, floating as if on air, glancing back, summoning me with her stare. I skip after her, stumble, fall, scrape my knee, get up, desperate to reach her....only to miss her by a heartbeat....
Even central and northern African tribes despise the southern tribes. Not only for their violent nature towards other tribes and nations, but the fact that they won’t grant anybody else their little space under the sun. Not even their own brothers. Like the Malemas and Zumas who steal their countrymen blind. There are other black Africans who would have used the opportunity presented in South Africa in the early 1990s to build something magnificent and maintain the infrastructure already in place. Even within South Africa. But, as has been the case since the first Boers moved into unoccupied land in the 19th century (the republics of Transvaal and Free State were established here) and tribes living in adjacent areas saw an opportunity to steal, rape and murder, the elements in power today plunder everything in sight.
Did I mention that Little A's favorite sport is baseball?
The next morning, Alexander wakes and finds it’s raining. He happily thanks God.
So I’m back. BB is still much better, and each day, we see more and more of him coming out. He amazes me with his humor and just yesterday, a computer animation he put on YouTube surpassed 9,000,000 views. For reals. He’s got a bright future ahead.
A cup or two of cremini mushrooms, quartered or sliced
By that point, I expect to be thoroughly exhausted, but very hopefully cheerful!
Experience #2: Shortly after that meeting, I went to a meeting at a contractor’s office in Finland. Keep in mind that the Finns are not the warmest of people. But I was warmly greeted. The reception area was beautifully appointed with art on the walls and beautiful, comfortable furniture. There were coffee table books about the company as well as colorful industry magazines. There was some very nice music playing. I waited a short time and was greeted warmly again and taken to a beautiful meeting room that was well lit and warm and friendly. They told me that the lights were full spectrum lights, which feels more like natural sunlight. Now the Finns do this because their winters are so dark. But why don’t we do this on interior rooms with no windows? It creates a totally different feeling.
The computer doesn’t understand what “day” means, doesn’t understand what “donkeys” is.
So have fun… And go take a look in their webshop or their shops around the world. Hope your curiosity had been satisfied! :) and the durability of this garmets prooved!
My First Confession happened as part of this big group event where all the second graders in my parish went to Mass with our families and then the kids headed toward the back of the church and formed lines snaking up to the various confessional booths. Of course the more popular priests had longer lines – sort of like when you registered for college courses and everyone wanted to get the class that started at noon or the professor who never gave essay exams. It was like waking up early for tickets to a really good concert. Of course we were all seven years old and in this case the concert was The Sacrament of Reconciliation. (Not a bad band name, now that I think about it.)
I had an interesting discussion with a co-worker today about why I read what I kindly refer to as smut books. I responded that it was mindless fantasy with a happy ending guaranteed. I don't have to think to read most of them.
So what am I getting at? Yes you guessed it! The Camra/Keg debate.
From: The Dean
TGIF my friends!!!!! Looking forward to my weekend (hopefully it doesn't rain). We're going to take our kids to the park to play some hoops....yes basketball!! Of course my camera will come with me so I can take LOTS of pictures.
I don't normally write short stories. There's a reason. I want to go on and on with the story, get into every one's heads as to what they are doing and make the plot twist and turn and... well, that's impossible to do with a short story. The novel and short story may seem similar to some, but they are very different. You have to tell a story within so many pages--like five or eight or ten. We're given a 6,000 words max, so I've got more than enough pages to play with.
Ok, enough about that - on to Miss Allie!
"Sometimes the citizens of this nation take freedom for granted. Apathy is a great risk to the preservation of freedom. Governments must sometimes be reminded of the words of our second President, John Adams, "You have rights antecedent to all earthly goernments; rights that cannot be repealed or restrained by human laws; rights derived from the Great Legislator of the universe." When any government forgets those words, it also forgets the reason for governments to exist."
Place the tray in the fridge and chill overnight or until set. Best prepared day before serving although you can prepare a few days ahead and store in an airtight container in the fridge.
What you do is, you give me a compensation for my time involved."
No …
And we’ve believed in these lifestyle solutions because everyone around us insists they’re workable, a collective repeating mantra of “renewables, recycling” that has dulled us into belief. Like Eichmann, no one has told us that it’s wrong.
And we did some crafts, too!
October 28 – December 16
Cut it at midnight and can’t express the feeling of this creamy heaven in the mouth. YUM!
Our Top Three for this fortnight, and in no particular order are:
He moved on the balls of his feet to the doorway and looked out. The moaning grew louder coming from Jack’s room. Ronan moved down the hall, drawn gun at his side, and listened at Jack’s door. The noises continued, but they did not sound fearful or painful. Jack might be having a nightmare. Lord knew he had reasons to have nightmares.
I can't believe myself ~ I am already thinking about new creations for this next Winter/Christmas!! I think it must be the weather doing this to me ~ all this snow outside! I will have to make sure I don't get carried away and start anything new, even though I can see myself losing that battle and maybe making one little one of the wintry pieces ~ you see I am weak sometimes when it comes to any new ideas!
Some of his disciples moved on to the college ranks, including three current D-1 head coaches: his successor at The Citadel, Fred Jordan; Tony Skole (ETSU); and Dan McDonnell (who made a little history for himself by leading Louisville to Omaha a few years ago, joining the exclusive club of individuals to have played for and coached a CWS team).
'You are the ones who keep me alive
The show was perfect. The company even better. My professional and parent circles are great, but I put up a little barrier with people I have met later in life. There is a lot that my newer friends don't know about me. I temper my language, and think before I throw out a caustic barb (well sometimes!) There is something so wonderfully rejuvenating about being with people who know each other through and through. People who will always love you, no matter what you do or say.
It is going to be a dreary, rainy day here in Greensboro and I cannot tell you how tempting it is to just sit here and drink coffee and read Domino. Now go grab your copy.
The ‘Good Cop, Bad Cop’ analogy has often been suggested to provide a model for understanding Muslim behaviour in certain regards: Bad Cop carries out terrorist atrocity, Good Cop expresses profound sorrow but suggests that attacks will continue as long as certain demands are not met. However, in this model the Good Cop and the Bad Cop act on the basis of an explicit understanding of their roles, in pursuit of an objective agreed upon in advance. As one assumes that Islamist lobby groups and would-be terrorists are not actively colluding, we must answer the question of how an analogous coordination could take place, or abandon the model.
little.
Mankind has entered a period of unprecedented global upheaval, according to these experts, when the earth and all life on it will undergo apocalyptica marked by the end of the “thirteenth baktun” of the Mesoamerican Mayan Long Count. The exact end date of this calendar is December 21, 2012, when during the winter solstice at 11:11, GMT (Greenwich Mean Time), the New Age crowd says the sun will align with the galactic center of the Milky Way galaxy, an event that occurs only every thirteen thousand years. The precession of the equinoxes will conclude a twenty-six-thousand-year cycle, bringing the astrological Age of Pisces to an end and introducing the beginning of Aquarius, when the next cycle begins and the sun rises out of the mouth of the Ouroboros (great serpent of the Milky Way). This is the sun rising in Sagittarius, the centaur with a bow—the symbol for Nimrod coming out from the mouth of Leviathan and the sun “god” rising again—Apollo/Osiris. The Mayans predicted this conjunction, interpreting it as a harbinger of the end of the world as we know it and the beginning of a new “enlightened” pagan age. People from the world’s greatest religions including Christianity and Islam also see current global developments as potential omens of an end-times scenario leading to the Apocalypse. This includes catholic mystics who believe in the Prophecy of the Popes.
"Wow! I was skinny....too bad I didn't appreciate it then!"
The rules of the game were simple: boys versus girls; teacher (that’s me) shouted out the name of an item of clothing and the first pupil to arrive at my desk with said item in their hands, intoning the magic sentence ‘voilà mon/ma whatever-it-was, Monsieur Pearse’ was the winner. Looking back on events, it now seems quite obvious that I really hadn’t thought this one through. I quickly realised that, with only three items pupils could reasonably be expected to pull off their bodies, this game had a very short shelf-life. However, not one for backing down, I carried on, determined to do my professional best and hopeful that those three items would be enough to see me through to bell time.
Bamako received its first rainfall in six months last Friday morning, temporarily reducing the hot spell. The rain, however, came around the same time as a deadly accident on the Pont des Martyrs that took the lives of three U.S. military advisers and three Moroccan civilians.
Very first picture is multiple images (5) stitched together in Photoshop.
And it doesn't help when family members bring up the times when I've lost it and yelled at Jackson. I have a fair amount of patience, but everyone has a breaking point. When faced with this behavior day in and day out for years, when doing it all on my own (because even before I was divorced, my ex was never around and all the care and discipline of the kids was my responsibility), when combining that with other stresses and five other kids who need attention, it's hard to not lose it sometimes. But there's really no reason to bring it up and make me feel crappier than I already do. Believe me, I beat myself up enough for the times that I've yelled and said horrible things like I'm ready to put him up for adoption. I would take it all back if I could. I'm doing the best I can with what I have to work with. I'm trying. I'm not perfect. Not even close. But I love my kids and I'm doing my best.
“It’s hard to say,” came the nurse’s reply. “He’s just had an infusion of morphine, so he may be simply out of it at the moment. But, I think, at some level he will register your presence. Take his hand, talk to him quietly. People sense things at all sorts of levels.”
a look through my pile of magazines has lead me to the conclusion that glossies are like a good cheese; becoming more deliciously flavoursome with time and i-D's april issue is no exception. i shall support this..
A fat man in a new Mercedes drove him to the door
Once, a new puppy from across the street came bouncing across the road to play with the cute little girl. What the poor puppy wasn't counting on was Lulu trying to protect her owner. When the puppy got too close, Lulu jumped off the porch, landed on the puppy's back, and road that poor thing back across the road like a pony. I felt bad for the puppy, but I swear, it's one of the funniest things I've ever seen....EVER!
Did you wait until you were 18?
In a single moment
How you eat, drink and rest DOES effect your skin. When you are eating properly, drinking enough clean, pure water and getting enough rest, this translates into anti-aging. Proper nutrition, hydration and rest give your body the necessary tools to stay healthy and in balance. Not enough of any of these and your body gets out of balance, goes into conservation/survival mode and tries to hold onto everything that belongs to it. It (the body) will slow down the natural skin regeneration processes. It will pull hydration from the skin to hydrate itself internally and will slow down the production of natural lipid barriers and oils as all of it’s energy goes into keeping the body running. The result will be itchy, flaky, dull, tired, sagging and wrinkled skin in the areas that that are more prone to dryness already. This means the face, around the eyes, lips, hands, lower legs, elbows, knees, and feet. So eat, drink and sleep! Your skin will thank you for it!
The UAE, London, Paris, New York and Moscow might be soon the hosts for the innovative, brave and enchanting new way of “making” architecture. The genius here is the Italian architect Dr. David Fisher whose Dynamic Architecture is revolutionizing the concept of what architecture can do and challenging the notion that buildings can only be static.
Not to worry they’re other fish in the sea. Jill Stein of the Green Party has a very sane 5-point program. I know she may seem boring as we all love our bad boys but really a psychopath who murders innocent civilians and destroys countries using drone attacks will eventually turn on you. Didn’t you see “Sleeping With the Enemy?” Hello! And there’s also Anderson of the Justice Party. So don’t despair you’ll find somebody new. Maybe not right away but you won’t have to sleep alone forever.
I hope she can wear them for soccer this spring!
by Edna St. Vincent Millay
when their fellowship was laid to rest,
with,” he said.
In Frank Cottrell Boyce’s ‘Chitty Chitty Bang Bang Flies Again’ – the original Chitty’s engine is reassembled (without the family’s knowledge) inside a camper van. So when they set off, their trip around the world is like no other.
because the LORD has anointed me
Why didn’t the French take a greater role in suppressing the violence after more conservative elements regained control in Paris? In fact, Napoleon wanted to send troops but was stretched thin with campaigns in India and Egypt and war with Britain. In 1802, after peace with Britain, Napoleon did manage to send a force of 12,000 under Charles Leclerc with orders to take San Domingo, restore it to French rule, and arrest L’Ouverture. Napoleon did not at first plan to reestablish slavery but he wanted to restore French sovereignty over a white-run colony. The outnumbered French defeated the blacks, forcing L’Ouverture to surrender in the spring of 1802. Leclerc thought it best to pardon L’Ouverture and let him return to civilian life rather than exile him to France, but kept a wary eye on him. Most of the black soldiers came over to the victorious French side.
2010.09.08 Iraq Baghdad 3 19 Three people are killed by a car bomb blast.
I am not a retailer, and if I had to feed my family (wheat free, of course) and pay mortgage and tuitions and buy shoes for all the rug rats, I would want people buying Christmas presents up the ying yang. But I would not begin before Thanksgiving.
Publication Year: 2009 (America); 2001 (Japan)
Gregory: your poll numbers go up and down
It evoked soo many memories and my early dating years with Moxen. Every song they had produced, was able to depict, relate to every fondful joy, grief, angry episodes we shared. I would dare to say L’Arc~en~Ciel accompanied us to grow as a couple & will continue on…within our family (including my FSIL & her husband) and i hope to extend to our children or any future generations.
They took us to the Olympiastadion, with its Fascist brutalism, where Hitler had watched the Games in 1936 - and raged when Jesse Owens beat his own Aryan star - and probably still more because Lutz Long behaved like a sportsman. We were taken to the shed at Plötzensee where the 1944 conspirators were hanged with piano wire, and I felt as if their horror and anguish had stayed in that place, chilling the air.
I really enjoyed watching this lecture. He’s getting some of this material from Richard Bauckham’s awesome book “Jesus and the Eyewitnesses”, so if you aren’t familiar with it, you can get an idea of what’s in it. Peter Williams is a lot of fun to listen to – an excellent speaker. And this material was NEW TO ME. I like the way that this lecture is filled with little UK expressions like “mind the gap” and “Yah?”. He doesn’t say “if you like” as much as Justin Brierley, though. Just once I would like to have a discussion with Justin and have him say that, then I would say “no I don’t like that”. I think that would be funny, and I would love to see the expression on his face when I said that.
Or I might be nowhere…
Restaurant Hospitality
I, though I would oppose any attempt to have our church building used for such purposes, support the freedom for others on classically liberal grounds. More on that later. However, it raises an interesting question about the functioning of the Equalities Act, on which I was ruminating the other day. It has a partial reference, also, to the bed-and-breakfast question which was debated prior to the election last year, and explains something of how freedom of expression functions in a liberal society. It is the following.
The winning caption (by me, MJ) for Steve’s pic was a poem. Allow me to explain.
And you need to trust the plan.
That comment reminded me of a poem I had heard once before about how life has a beginning and an ending but what matters most is the dash...what happens between those two points.
Butterfly images to trace and cut out (I have provided some at the bottom of this post which can be made to any size you like, but feel free to make some of your own or image search around the internet)
The other cruddy thing is I actually got a really good race shot by the hubs and now have a bad day to associate it with. Crud.
Knit until entire piece measures 6 inches.
The most interesting thing happened to me Saturday night, my friends. An invisible and ghostly silent MACK truck ran right over me. Yep. Left me aching all over, feverish, and feeling as if my my throat had been crushed. My temp. actually reached 103.5, which is pretty amazing for me.
For the Tempeh Ribs:
Spare spokes and nipples
4. I generally do not screw lids back onto things. I get them about halfway on, and I stop. I don't know why; it's a pathology.
1- Abraham Lincoln (February 12, 1809 – April 15, 1865) 16th president;
If I could live again, I would travel lighter.
This type of cake is easy if you plan ahead- in the week ahead of time: make the cakes and freeze. then take out the day of party and ice.
campaign to find ‘politicians that look like stuff’.
“Why give me hope – Then give me up – Just to be the death of me – Save the rest of me” – That was my fear once the weekend was over. I was afraid that I was going to have this fabulous weekend with him where my life felt perfect but something was going to interfere. I kept expecting a hiccup in my plans and dreams. I was afraid one night I was going to talk to him and he was going to change our plans and end things before they had truly been able to happen. It would have been devastating, it would have been the death of me, but it wasn’t. It wasn’t because he believed in us the same way I believed in us and two weeks after our weekend I returned to Alabama and we started the rest of our lives together. This song though, it makes me think about how devastating my life would have been if either of us had hesitated and not seen this through. My husband is the love of my life. It’s an obsessive love. It’s a strong, devoted, committed love and it’s beautiful and it’s exciting and it’s forever.
But should he have to do those things for me to be able to love him in return? No.
It's a very small world!!!
P-Scott and I met in Boston. He was studying at an art school and I was studying music. We just met through a friend of a friend and started playing guitar together and recording in 2003.
For tonight's session, I was playing my monk, Robyn Hoodwink and another friend, B, was playing his cavalier-paladin, Lord Neville Trollbane.
Cricut® Cartridge Martha Stewart Seasonal Cake Art - pg.36 cut @ 1.5" & 2"
Mr Sheridan was then asked about another private investigator involved in the matter, Steve Whittamore. Mr Coulson told the court that he had never had any dealings with Mr Whittamore or asked anyone else to deal with him. Mr Sheridan asked Mr Coulson if Mr Whittamore had been used by the News of the World “while you were boss”. Mr Coulson said he did not know. Mr Sheridan then said that Steve Whittamore had been convicted in 2005 and this had happened “under your watch”. Mr Coulson said he had not been involved with Mr Whittamore “in any way, shape or form”.
I just received this letter from Bonnie, which I'm publishing in its entirety. If you can help by signing Bonnie's petition to reverse the U.S. Attorney's decision, please contact her at Bonkaye@aol.com. You don't have to be an Airleaf victim--just a concerned member of the writer community.
including my favorite brunette dollie
Since we were a team, we needed a team name, naturally we choose ‘Bazinga’ Yep, were rad. We wanted to make the team thing official so we also made some rad ‘Bazinga’ t-shirts! All thanks to my wonderfully creative boyfriend, honestly they were amazing, he is spectacular!
Reuters is reporting that Carlsberg expects strong growth in beer sales in Russia as the economy there rebounds and as government efforts to reduce alcohol consumption push more drinkers away from vodka and toward beer.
But nevertheless, it was a beautiful evening, well organized and spent with very beautiful group of people. Organizations working behind this event was JCEC, Sussie ( from Sussie of arabia; a blog i have been following for a long time and was soo excited to see Sussie there!!! ), Jeddah heart, Nomad & Arabian Jewels. Links are listed below.... Defiantly check them out to stay updated on more happenings around Jeddah and what these organizations are upto :)
Hey ya'll, hope you are off to a great day. Several have asked about the new grandbaby, and he/she is apparently not as eager to meet all of us as we are to meet him. The Man and I have been living out of our suitcases for a week and a half now. Saturday is the actual due date, but with the false labor that's been going on for a couple of weeks now, we have all expected an early arrival. I know my sweet DIL is so very ready to be done, but she never-ever complains at all. I will keep ya'll posted.
The only issue I'm currently having is choosing a sparge method. I'm leaning towards a batch sparge, which seems to be more traditional, but a continuous sparge may allow for more precise wort collection. I'm still doing research on this. Any ideas would be appreciated.
The markets – very much with Geithner’s blessing – have taken the view that, without constant 24/7 harassment and vicious attacks, the eurocrats will be too smug and dumb to get their house in order. They also figure that the worse they make things, the more easily Germany will be able to persuade the eurozoners to fall into line. Being just as amoral as the Fed and the White House, the markets want a stable, strong centre to a unified Europe…with one ‘thing’ they can point at to say “So then, you’re the guy who pays the bill”. At the moment, the PR in favour of this being the ECB is non-stop, and costing somebody (probably the Fed and/or the CIA) a fortune. Mario Draghi will resist this, and he should indeed do so: central banks are, in the end, the holders of taxpayers’ money. They are not there to give lenders an easy mark. The Germans are very strong on this point…..something that is, not surprisingly, causing friction between Berlin and Washington.
Northampton, MA ♦ Our Place Summercamp gets kids out of the house and into nature. For 5 days campers hike, climb, wade and swim “our place”: the 5 ecoregions of the Nonotuck biome. These activities aren’t just “fun”—they’re designed to increase camper’s perceptual abilities, stimulate their critical thinking skills, inspire their creative imaginations, and counteract “nature deficit disorder.” Through active physical and mental engagement with “our place,” they gain a deep and lasting appreciation of it—and themselves. Campers go from site to site—mountains, forests, brooks, industrial brownﬁelds, you name it—enjoying an adventurous, inquiry-based investigation into how our biome is a unique and beautiful bio-home (the home of diverse forms of life).
By the way, I didn't add the thing in the bottom left-hand corner ^^
Very near my house is a great little bistro with a fantastic eggplant burger and a rockin' wine list. Before the meal, the guests are served both an herbed olive oil dipper and an olive tapenade along with various kinds of breads to enjoy while they sip their wine and wait for their meal to be prepared and served. While the upper Midwest is hardly known for its olive production, we do have some magnificent little restaurants and a fair few small businesses who specialize in supplying our population with amazing olives from throughout the world.
So to all of you finding this blog area now think how lucky you are to be here in the beginning.
2 For an obituary of Thomas Terrell (1852–1928) see The Times (Monday, 30 April 1928) p 19. Further information from Richard Terrell, The Chief Justice: A Portrait from the Raj (Michael Russell, Salisbury 1979), (1928) 3 Greya (Michaelmas Term) 8, www.balean.net/terrell.html, and miscellaneous sources.
The Court of Justice of the European Union (‘ECJ’) has provided clarification on the liability of companies operating internet marketplaces for trade mark infringement committed by users, holding that, in certain circumstances, the operator may be liable for trade mark infringement as a result of the postings of its users. National courts must be able to order those companies to take measures intended not only to bring to an end infringements of IP rights, but also to prevent further infringements of that kind.
But with the Ravens/Steelers, most of the games are NOT decided by that many points. Turnovers are key, defense is critical, and best of all the two teams have a genuine distaste for each other, both on and off the field.
It’s there.
Taste: 5/5
And keeping those pesky little rodents out of our house. : )
As a trial of their new method, the scientists studied the components of 15 traditional Chinese medicines that were confiscated at the Australian borders by the customs. The result showed that 31% of the samples contained Aristolochia plants (although the scientists note that further study is needed to test for the presence of aristolochic acid). In addition, four of the samples tested contained DNA from endangered animals, revealing that illegal hunting and trafficking of these animals still persist.
I went to goodwill in the sleet and freezing rain and didn't find a thing....
It’s not just hotels and beach bars that are affected by the drop in tourism. Anyone who supplies food and beverages is hurt, too. From chickens to milk, lettuce to lemons, farmers and middlemen have seen their sources of revenue dry up. Taxi drivers can no longer rely on fares. Shopkeepers lament the open purses of tourists, now disappeared. Hotels have laid off staff.
As I approached the intersection today, I saw that there had been an accident. One car had been hit broadside and was sitting on the far side of the intersection after skidding there from the impact of the other car, which was badly smashed in the front. There was an unconscious man in the driver's seat of the broadsided car, and a woman sitting by the side of the road with blood on her face, who I assumed was the driver of the other car. Several others had already pulled over to help, but there were no police or ambulance on the scene yet, so I stopped to see if I could help. I grabbed my first aid kit and went to the unconscious man first. I asked one of the other people on the scene how long he had been unconscious.
by Tricia Goyer
FREE SHIPPING! (in the USA)
While both market-rate and affordable units must have comparable sets of fixtures, a developer is allowed to upgrade market-rate units. So expect much higher-end fixtures in the latter.
April: "Where's this fucking place at, I got shit to do. Fucking dealing with you guys all fucking night."
deterioration in the quality and
Principal Paul Keats sent a letter home to parents that said he could not allow students to disrupt the “educational environment.”
Don Ward – owner of the Comedy Store in London – a perfectly named place – store instead of shop – as the idea being stolen from America – and “store” where comedy is sold - Don Ward once asked me at an Edinburgh party “which Lewis Schaffer do we have tonight: The funny Lewis Schaffer or the not funny Lewis Schaffer?” My point: Most people know what they see but don’t understand it.
Golden Dawn’s candidates are not career politicians; they include farmers, shepherds, workers and retired army officers.
Importantly, the ruling is unique to the UK and only impacts people reading and sharing news in that country. As recognised by the Copyright Tribunal, copyright is governed by national law and users of media monitoring services outside UK are not subject to NLA licensing fees today.
This is one of my favorite ways of bringing in money. Why? Because I LOVE teaching and this way I get to do both: stay-at-home and teach. I find jobs many different ways. I have posted some on job boards. You can also use craigslist. I have recently found Care.com. You can post your own ad and people can find you, or you can find people who have listed what they need.
“Texas State Unit 79 is following an eastbound blue Cadillac at mile 158, about four miles west of Shamrock, Texas. Do you want him to stop the vehicle?”
So I had a sleep study done. The doctor asked me a lot of lifestyle questions and I told him about my drinking, bipolar, etc. and mentioned the weight gain. He saw the stretch marks on my stomach. They were a deep purple almost because my stomach had stretched so much so fast. He said my puffy face and the color of the stretch marks concerned him. He had me checked for all kinds of things even Kushing's disease. He began coordinating with my general practitioner. I got on the CPAP which I still need to use.
Don't forget to leave a comment on the blog to be in with a chance of winning 12 Powders and a case!
What about you, peeps? What are your experiences/thoughts on re-querying agents who initially passed?
Your box is ready to receive mail for another year!
We are soaking up the beach and holding delicious babies in both arms at our favorite place on earth.
I quickly pop up to my feet just as I hear the laughter starting from the group of people queued out beside me. I was pleased to see that I somehow avoided ripping a hole in my leggings and was just taking my first step when someone from the line yelled out, “Way to go drunky!”
would mean an ideal environment to write, but I like to take a break and slob around when alone. I was nearly four days ahead of schedule for NaNoWriMo, my brain was beginning to tire and I was developing a sore lower back from siting at my desk, so I decided to only write a bit on each of those four days. On day
Super cute face number 3. It is from PK Wide Eyed Kids. All of the doodling is done with my Sakura Jelly Roll Pens and Stampin Up markers. The little brads are ones I found at Michael's.
Mole Crickets: Mole crickets, so called because they look like moles, live underground. They are less than 1/2 inch in length. They are nocturnal and are found to fly even up to the australian test cricket team and the test cricket audio of statistics. Maintaining cricket stats help them to create cricket blogs on websites. You just have to make your voice heard, about any milestone that he feels.
When your pots, pans and baking trays are enameled they can stain and discolor with normal use over time. Fill them with warm water, pour a tablespoon of salt and vinegar and leave it to soak overnight. You will be amazed at the radiance of your favorite pots.
I remember Corinne doing this too...a lot that is going on is bringing back memories. We traveled with 14 families that trip, and there were 14 little Chinese zombies walking or being carried all around. I kind of think they/she is going into survival mode. She doesn't particularly like us, but she knows that she needs us to stay alive, so she'll follow us around, stay quite, but she certainly isn't giving us anything. She'll hold our hand, but doesn't really grip your hand. She allows us to carry her, but she leans away from our body. She looks at us intently, until we realize she's looking, and then she turns her head 180 degrees the other way. Oh well...normal stuff, I've come to learn...and having watched Corinne go through it, I know that it will come out ok, but it's really sad too. Poor thing. I wish that I could communicate with her, and tell her that it will be ok, but I can't. She can't even interpret our actions, much less our words.
Despite this, there are moments of real quality here worth pointing out. Parkhouse is very good at writing a dark fantasy tone, with stretches here and there feeling like they came out of an infinitely budgeted Warrior’s Gate. But on the whole the increase of the magazine’s focus on the series as a whole and on serving as a paratext for the series came with an increasing deemphasis of the comic strip. Whereas in the Doctor Who Weekly days the rest of the magazine was just filler for a Doctor Who comic book, in the Davison era the comic becomes almost extraneous to the publication.)
Billy Graham
Hat - Urban? Target? Forever 21? Somewhere inexpensive
As I came up the stairs yesterday, I stopped and looked over our photographs. It was a 'this is your life moment'... My son as a 4 year old, blonde headed and cuddly, my daughters as they no longer wish to be remembered (chubby but adorable...) and my daughters as gorgeous teenagers... I saw my husband as he was when we married, I was reminded of my father in the streets of Arles, I glimpsed a peak of Venice and I had the bittersweet reminder of a friend who is no longer with me... That is the beauty of photographs... they transport... and they enable us to time travel for the briefest of moments... xv
The conference will also provide opportunities to authors to present findings in their recent books that build on Schumpeter’s ideas.
Charles put the pencil to the paper. Where do I begin, with her eyes? Her body? Her hair? Before feelings of defeat could set in, his inner child took over and began to play by putting bold strokes onto the paper. He allowed his inner child the freedom to create. This was fun! Charles began to feel something within him coming alive as he let him Self be free. He did his best to capture not only her outer beauty, but her inner beauty and femininity as well.
Abdullahi’s outspoken ways have been controversial. In 2009 she planned a “million divorcee march” in the streets of Kano to protest the dire situation of many divorcees and widows. Tongues wagged over such a scandalous idea. Men — and women — condemned it.
3. If there was one person in the world whose diary you could steal and read, whose would it be?
The papers are from Pion and Maja Design.
"Have you ever encountered a random stranger reading your book? and have you ever said anything to them?"
Here is a link of someone's redone bar cart that is my inspiration for the colors. I love the white and orange, so I think I'm going to either paint mine all white with orange patterns on the main surface, or paint silver over the silver that is already there, and do a orange & white on the main surfaces. Enjoy Monica at craftynest's bar cart here: http://www.craftynest.com/2009/04/wallpapered-cart/
- A sawtooth wave, with its gradual climb but sudden drop gives a full-on bright rasp.
My wife and friends tell me I’m giving chain restaurants too much credit for caring about my health. Some say it’s a matter of restaurants being too cheap to buy enough dishware for a busy evening. Others say it’s the economics of table turn … a less than subtle way of telling you it is time to go, there are others waiting for your table.
I also stamped out some images from the 7 gypsies Lille stamp set. I stamped them on to sections of the background paper (I still have lots left even after cutting out the tag and the bit for the card. ) Age the edges in the same way and glue into place. wrap some rusty wire around the bottom section of the card and twist.. bend into coils/springs using a thin paintbrush handle or a skewer or something similar and hang the wee birdie charm from it...
In preparation for September 2012, Halton District School Board has planned information sessions at various French Immersion centres where parents will receive specific information, as well as answers to frequently asked questions about Immersion programs. Parents will also receive a French Immersion Program Registration Form.
The MOU signed in January 2008,
I need His eternal perspective when I'm wading through the piles of laundry, dishes, and dirty diapers.
The holiday season is a great time to combine “giving” and your dealerships social media presence!
The cataclysm hardware requirements normal аnd ultra settings іѕ standard with rеgаrds tо processing speed, storage space, sound and visual appeal. Gamers whо utilize computers for video games wіll immediately identify the difference in thе experience based on thе settings used іn the hardware setup оf thе computer.
T&T Rotli from Lataji's Kitchen
Other: dove craft corner punch Spell binders nestie
On the elevation profile, this climb looks gradual, and lasts for about 20 miles, and is between 6,000 and 7,500 feet. We climbed up layers of sandstone and slickrock until we reached the Wildcat Canyon Trail, a rolling singletrack trail that weaved through the snow covered trees. At this point, large, dry snowflakes began to fall and we could see the destination, the giant sheer red and black water stained walls of Zion canyon.
Most amusing is the first video here, which shows my favourite war-enabler, Dr.Fintan Lane, whinge about how the damage was actually "life-threatening" (can we assume that Dr.Lane's doctorate is not in maritime engineering?) and the crew "certain" to have "lost lives". He then trots out the old favourite about it having been an attack on a "humanitarian aid" ship, a lie so discredited it's amazing he can keep a straight face. Botox maybe? Watch the clip and you'll see what I mean.
According to agriculturalist/horticulturalist George Ball writing in The Wall Street Journal, 2011 will be the year of the vegetable. Ball says kids will eat them if their parents tell them they must. (I ought to try that one….)
and nobody dies of old age.
It's been almost 20 years since I moved here. I still remember the first night. My friends had helped me move; my brother drove the small rental truck and my sister-in-law provided the strawberry pies to fortify all of us. When everyone left, I curled up on the sofa in a fetal position (things were piled on the bed) and wondered why I had left my apartment!
18. Hey Mr. Sun - Kurt Russell
I resisted the urge to giggle. I replied that I could make whatever she liked and had absolutely no problem doing brownies from scratch if that’s what she wanted. “Great, because I really don’t like brownies from a mix,” Mrs. K said, still sounding unsure of whether or not I was up to the task. As she continued to harp on the evils of brownie mix as though she hadn't heard me, I finally had to spell it out that I had made plenty of brownies without ever using a box mix in my entire brownie-baking career, and that in fact I would be happy to make something even more festive for their party if she so desired.
This recipe has been adapted from The King Arthur Flour 200th Anniversary Cookbook.
OX 123242 Kingsway
The voice has always been near mythical. The rough edged baritone matches the tales he tells. Waits is the master chronicler of the pathetic, the sad, the forgotten. He pulls no punches as he wraps his singular voice around his bitterly funny tales of losers. Clearly inspired by both Bing Crosby and Bukowski, with a shitload of Captain Beefheart thrown in just for a lark, Waits is one of the most important artists and one of my personal favourites.
Though things have progressed a great deal in many of the smaller towns, when you’re from Northwest Tennessee, Jackson’s a big hub – that’s where you go shopping for Christmas or your prom dress, that’s where you go to the orthodontist once a month, where people end up in the hospital when they have things more severe than the smaller ones can handle, where folks go to the doctor regularly – all those things. Many friends and old classmates live there. I lived there once briefly too, matter of fact.
I love these evenings!!
1/2 tsp. mustard powder
in time of daffodils(who know
Mom - Yes, very disgusting.
Never fear--the kitchen is just a few days from done !!
So some people start off with: gossiping, I do it, my peers do it thus it just cannot be helped, right? Wrong, it hurts and sometimes it is malicious. It hurts even more when the person who is at the forefront of the gossip finds out. Not only does it spread lies, but it also fabricates false rumours which then develops a running mill of lies about people; where the truth has been exaggerated or misunderstood. Sort of like Chinese whispers. Anyone remember that game? No? Let me remind you or enlighten you if you haven’t heard of it. It involves a group in which a person has to think of a secret or anything and whisper it into the ear of their neighbour. This is then passed round from neighbour to neighbour in a circle until it reaches the end of the circle and the last person who has to shout out loud what the “saying or expression” was. Then the original person who spread round the saying has to confirm whether the saying has remained in tact or digressed from the original saying. Let me illustrate this in an example: Person A: whispers to B “I heard Jenny’s mum say a rude word ”, person B to C: I heard Jenny’s mum sail around the world” person C to D: I heart Jenny’s mum sale around the world.
– MI Chief, Others Charged With Misspending Forfeiture Proceeds
What else can I say to fill up space that was intentionally left for the fucking thing I can`t remember. Damn…
-- Want to hear a funny story? I know you do. Well about 4ish years ago- soon after we married- I was having some horrible tummy pains throughout the day. It was the weirdest thing and I had no idea what the problem was. I did everything that night to help it feel better and nothing worked. I made myself go to sleep and around midnight woke up screaming (literally) in pain. I couldn't even move. Ryan was totally freaked out and said we were going to the ER right now. On the way there the pain was so bad I puked everywhere. We got there and waited... waited... waited... they drugged me up and I finally feel asleep while Ryan sat next to my bed as I lay there thinking I was dieing. They did some tests and were fairly certain I was experiencing a bad case of GAS PAINS! Now I had never had gas pains before that point in my life and I honestly thought I was going to die. Ryan was seriously pissed. HA. He gets gas pains all the time and we had a medicine cabinet full of Gas X. We got home sometime around 5am. Just in time for him to get dressed for work. I have never lived that one down. I had my husband take me to the ER for gas pain! haha. Now that I know what it is, I try not to be so dramatic about it but seriously it can hurt really really bad. I was told by my doc that I can take some GasX so when it gets really bad ill take a pill and it helps.
The test lasted four tedious hours. And I stayed on site waiting for her with my 2 and 4 year olds. I was equipped with food and toys to last that long. There was only one other boy there form a private school who promptly informed us that he had been studying and practicing for this test for WEEKS. Thanks kid. We needed that.
Christians who are not filling their minds with the Word of God are like warriors going out into battle without their weapons of warfare.
You can totally read this and do it at the same time. Or, you can do this with others, and have a reader. You can put in your own pauses, and take all the time you need!
1. By The Time I Get To Phoenix
Hope everybody had fun trying to incorporate the ABCs into poems.
As Pat heads off to a succession of wars, it becomes increasingly obvious that he probably won’t get out of this film alive. And he doesn’t – dying heroically during “one last mission” in China. The film ends with Peggy and Scott bravely going along to a company anniversary celebration, where Peggy pays tribute to her husband’s courage – and, implicitly, to that of all pilots. I was slightly startled to note that this final scene reworks the famous ending of A Star Is Born, as Scott introduces Peggy by saying “This is Mrs Patrick Falconer”. Since she isn’t famous under her maiden name, it doesn’t have quite the same shock as “This is Mrs Norman Maine”, but it does have a different type of poignancy because it is a man who loves Peggy saying it, and speaking her married name for the first time in the film.
The professors brother died of cancer, even though his brother prayed to God for healing. Jesus prayed for another way around the cross, but knew that it was meant to be that God’s will be done. God could have easily intervened and stopped this. I am not comparing a philosopher’s brother to Jesus saying that his brother had to die to bring glory to God. But perhaps during the time before the brother’s death was an opportunity and moment in time where God’s glory could have been displayed. We will venture to a story in 2 Corinthians chapter twelve where Paul has a “thorn” in his flesh and he prays three times for it’s removal in which God responds in verse nine with, “My grace is sufficient for you, for my power is made perfect in weakness.” After that point, Paul changes his mindset and says, “Therefore I will boast all the more gladly of my weaknesses, so that the power of Christ may rest upon me. 10For the sake of Christ, then, I am content with weaknesses, insults, hardships, persecutions, and calamities. For when I am weak, then I am strong.” We need to understand that God has everything under control. Anything and everything under the sun, whether good or bad, will ultimately bring glory to God. We need to understand that what happens to us happens for a reason. Prayer is crucial, as we should never cease to pray, but know in our prayers that “God’s will be done.” When we pray, we should be ready for both the response we want to hear and the response that we do not want to hear.
My third dream was about losing hope while trying to survive a zombie apocalypse.
“We are going to pay a very heavy price for the fact there has been a catalogue of neglect by the former Government which has focused on renewable energy sources,” Mr Birkett said.
Its history is a curious mixture of the military and the romantic. It was once a strategic defence and all over the island are the remains of forts and it was first used by the army as a convalescent home for wounded soldiers during the Crimean War: it was bought in 1912 by a man who had made his fortune in silver mining in Mexico and wanted to give it to his new wife as a wedding present, or so the story goes.
Some people say stupid, hurtful things. They might not mean them, but there they are, the insensitive ignorant pieces of shitty thinking, hanging over the discussion, forever marring my dealings with the utterers.
hoarfrost
The tiny little bell I tatted a few days ago and this pretty little star have inspired me to do a series of mini-ornaments for table-top trees. I probably won't do a huge number of them, but enough to have a good selection at next year's sale.
A whole year had gone faster than these speeding trains.
admit, Dr. Mohler, that I’m kind of selective on that point of view. I really turn almost exclusively to the teachings of Jesus Christ, who never mentioned homosexuality at all as a sin. He never condemned homosexuals and so I don’t condemn homosexuals. And our church, our little church in Plains, we don’t ask, when people come to join our church, if they’re gay or not. We don’t ordain, we don’t practice marriage between gay couples in our church, but that’s a Baptist privilege of autonomy of local churches. I’m against any sort of government law, either state or national, that would force churches to perform marriage between gay people, but I have no objection to civil ceremonies. And so, I know that Paul condemns homosexuality, as he did some other things like selfishness that everybody’s guilty of, and so I believe that Jesus reached out to people who were outcast, who were condemned, brought them in as equals and I also pretty well rely on Paul’s writing to the Galatians that everyone is equal in the eye’s of God and we’re treated with compassion. And I personally believe, maybe contrary to many of your listeners, that homosexuality is ingrained in a person’s character and is not something they adopt and can abandon at will. So I know that what I’ve just explained to you might be somewhat
So I say that makes me pretty lucky – wouldn’t you ???
* I took my government test first and got a 101. Yay!
I don't know how well Avalon Hill's version of Runequest ever sold, but their covers of Adventurers doing the traveling bit of the quest sold me hook, line and sinker. Forget the monsters on the shields. The dragon snarling from its pile of gold and booty? Been there, done that; got the +2 bastard sword and mithril-scaled tee-shirt. Forget the Otis scenes of combats full of devastating magic and horrific monster body parts, like tongues and talons. Nope I like the well groomed Saxon-armored female atop a horse, with a donkey tied to it, looking out onto some salt plains with mountains looming in the distance. At that point, my own personal brand of T&T would become about the tasks involved in getting from point A to point B, maybe some would say the torture of it, as well the trials and treasure at the heart of it.
“It’s unbelievable how the country — nay, the world — got so caught up by the Obedient Wives Club and the things they said,” read Khairul. “We the OKC have been advocating obedience and absolute submission to our parents and adults in general for almost 3 decades, and nobody paid attention. Like the OWC, we’ve taken the things we’ve been taught by our elders and written in books, and turned them into a policy, for what we believe would contribute to a harmoneous nuclear family and a healthy society in general. And yet no one stood up and protested vehemently. No one was disgusted, saying that we were ‘reversing a century of progress’ and so on. What gives?”
74) Your eyes are blue, like the ocean. And baby, I’m lost at sea
Add the chestnut puree and remaining water, stock cube, and evaporated milk and bring up to the boil. Mash or puree as desired. Adjust the seasoning with salt and pepper. Add a large knob of butter.
Now may God bless you all. May He defend the right. It is the evil things that we shall be fighting against – brute force, bad faith, injustice, oppression and persecution – and against them I am certain that the right will prevail.”
Monday is another Amy, Diary of a Quilter. She'll be posting right before she heads out to Kansas City to help me at market. I owe Amy a HUGE thanks for her help sewing samples, binding, and (in advance) standing in booth for hours on end. :o)
Teaching insight: Yesterday we wrote about the Master Pruner and in the course of our message commented on James 1:2 which states, “Consider it pure joy, my brothers, whenever you face trials of many kinds” (James 1:2). Will, a pastor friend from Marin County CA, makes this interesting and helpful observation:
Truth, loyalty, and honor were put first. "Truth once given form becomes imperishable," but let the edges of truth be blurred, and that pure form is very difficult to recover."
Paper bowl
If you’d like to get an impression, some of my favorites are:
Shoyu – This is the Japanese word for soy sauce. Shoyu is traditionally used as a condiment or seasoning after cooking, and for dipping sushi.
I was invited to visit the 2327 (Havant) Squadron Air Cadets in Bedhampton tonight.
Where I met my Norwegian husband.. who brought me back to...
I have been adjusting quite well to living on my own. I've started expanding my cooking horizons, and my friends and I decided to have a dinner party once a week to practice our cooking and just relax over a good home-cooked meal. Last time I hosted it chez moi, and made poulet à la crème- SO GOOD! By the time I come home, I'll be full of yummy French recipes that I can just whip up :)
You will soon realize reading the book, there is no factions, no world to play upon and above no seriousness. That is simply not allowed. This does make for a welcome change as you can really go to town on your own narrative.
that we'll use for years to come.
One more thing...
October 2, 2010. He is charged under the Terrorist Act’s
The next drawing is a shovel, which means they had tools to help them."
A few months before I turned 16, I moved to FL. Before the departure, my dad asked me where I would like to go for a special dinner, a 16th birthday tradition he celebrated with each of his daughters. I considered various locations and settled on The Pump Room (Chicago). Looking back I probably chose it largely because it sounded so snobby and I had seen it many times while bumming around Michigan Ave.
The fire of 1805 burned the city of Detroit to the ground, leaving little more than ashes and broken dreams. Detroit’s motto, Speramus meliora; resurget cineribus ("We hope for better things, it will rise from the ashes") was crafted in reaction to this terrible disaster.
So I have a small confession to make. I had lovingly laid out all the dresses in piles ready to photograph with the notes and cards from the makers on top so I didn't get mixed up only they got moved by unnamed members of my family and I got a bit confused!! I think I have got the dresses matched to the correct people but please forgive me if not! What was really lovely is that I could match individual dresses to the same maker by looking at the seams and the way they were made. This made me smile for some reason. I love that each person makes things slightly differently and I that I could identify dresses from that.
When they became independent readers, I steered them away from the babysitting, kid detective, and girl clique series that are so prevalent in young adult literature and instead put books from authors like Laurie Halse Anderson into their open little hands and minds.
Next week, 24 January 2012 at 1PM at the Almshouse again, we will discuss a portion of the text in detail. This text will be 4 Ezra 9.26-10.59, the fourth vision/episode.
The Strand
Mat 21:14 Then the blind and the lame came to Him in the temple; and He healed them.
"The Case of the Life Raft"
Still.. that wasn’t chocolate enough. So hey, a ganache. Why not? I was bored.. .I had semi-sweet chocolate chips laying around doing nothing and being bored like me. So I put them to work and made my go to ganache recipe. This time I decided to whip it. Whip it real good… while cold. Then I added some caramel topping that I had in the fridge. Yes, that looked bored too so I invited it to the party. And boy.. that was the best guest as it complimented the chocolate so very well. I even decided to give it a bonus by drizzling it on top of the cake… which of course I had poured some un-whipped ganache that was leftover. Why waste?
that emotional bonding attaches to your soul, thus forming a soul tie. Yes, we are going
Brand: BlackBerry
This week my husband and I went away for two days. A friend kept our older two boys and my sister kept the younger two kids. We got a later start than we planned to after having to stop back at home a couple times for forgotten things. Got to my sisters house (she lives about 15 min from us) and realized that neither of us ever put Sierra's overnight bag in the car. Thankfully the small town my sister lives in has a dollar general and Sierra got a new outfit, new jammies, and we just grabbed some diapers and wipes too.
The homeowner desired an Mediterranean styled garden reflective of her travels to Italy and France yet empathetic to our long dry California summers.
Clean Team: The band doesn't preach their Mormon teachings in their songs, but none of them drink or party. "It's funny how backstage, if you say you're doing it for God or doing it for morals or for health, people say, 'That's stupid' or 'lame.' But if you say you've been sober for 10 years, they respect you because you've been through AA," Glenn says. "Half the people think I'm on drugs anyway, I've always had a drone-y southern California voice and worn sunglasses in an airport when I shouldn't."
People say "congratulations". "How exciting." "Oh my gosh, in this market?". "You must be thrilled!".
“I a? going to ?atch you ? big fish”.
And yet, the so-called “revolutionary” changes that were made were less revolutionary and more restrictive and a pinch of draconian that contradicted the intentions of the Federal Constitution as well as the international norms.
From Valley of Vision
A few days ago, Arvin passed away. He succumbed to a cardiac arrest. At 38.
Live in the now.
ADHD is for sissies. Autism, it's overdone...
email me at thepleatedpoppy@gmail,com with your addy and your treats will be on their way!
And beautiful!
“You are attempting a ‘Gruevisation’ of the Constitutional Court” said Jani Makraduli, a legislator from the Social Democrats, at last week’s parliamentary session.
But the fear that such exposure would necessarily boost Breivik’s cause, and encourage likeminded bigots elsewhere, must be resisted. In fact it is precisely on occasions like these that a vibrant public sphere matters most.
Mrs T. Thornton and Mrs L Chambers of Brisbane
Along with the images shown in a previous article, the following report below was also received. Please, if you have images or reports please email them to me at voteforbnp@hotmail.co.uk
Silhouettes (silhouettes)
Well, I thought it’d been longer since my last blog post but I’m happy to realize I’ve been keeping up with my goal of “at least once a week”. Though losing time isn’t something I tend to do often, though this is a special case as I’ve been kind of distracted, last week my best friend was visiting from all the way across lake michigan! She was here last week from the 12th to the 19th, but I did manage to get a post in that week. But other than that I got almost nothing done. Then this week, (19th to well, today the 22nd) I’ve been up north visiting my girlfriend and talk about getting absolutely nothing done! haha. But anyways let me deal with this in moderate order.
In some of the recent and most historic civil conflicts around the world today from Libya, Sudan and today in Syria, a common dilemma facing those countries and the international community is whether attempts to resolve conflicts peacefully should always take priority over any attempts to bring those who have committed mass atrocities to justice. This has become also one of the biggest challenges facing the International Criminal Court which has faced criticism that its focus on bringing those most responsible for such atrocities to justice has undermined peace attempts in countries like Sudan and Uganda. Professor Mendes will discuss whether this is a false dilemma and that in many situations of mass atrocities there is really not a zero sum game between peace and justice. He will focus in particular on the present attempts to bring the top leaders accused of crimes against humanity in Sudan, Uganda and possible future attempts against the
I love Disney/Pixar films. They are fantastic. Is it any wonder why we all love them so much? They certainly don't just throw something together and call it a day. Days, weeks, months and years of planning, drawing, writing, on and on it goes until they come to the final product. The movie.
Both those angels are named, and in the passages where they’re named they sure don’t do anything like the “angel of the Lord” does”.
This is the way the EPA operates, with lies and made up statistics and enormous fines. They intend to scare their victims into instant compliance with the EPA grab for power. They need to be stopped. Senator James Inhofe (R-OK) has launched an investigation into the Obama-EPA tactics towards domestic energy production in the light of their recent efforts to frighten the public about safe hydraulic fracturing.
For puff pastry:
The solid Beat coupled with cool Doo-Wop grouping and crazy lyrics makes this one worth a listen!
Vanberg & DeWulf decription: "Castelain is the classic example of the rare Blonde Bière de Garde style, and is the biggest seller from the brewery. Castelain has a sweet palate and a great deal of finesse. It is sweet, slightly bitter, grassy and herbal— made with four types of hops. Castelain is conditioned a minimum of 6 to 10 weeks to develop aroma and flavor."
But khakis were the first thing I thought to suggest to you for pants that are dressier than jeans, but still casual. Chains like The Gap usually carry khaki pants as a staple. I’ve bought khakis at department stores, but you have to search to find them in updated cuts (i.e. not mom jeans). I’m afraid I don’t have any photos of myself in khakis. I’d like to pretend the khaki-period never existed for me.
We arrived at Can-Do in time to register, and we got our Spin Jerseys and tickets to get in. I started to get a rush of adrenaline (and a bit of nervousness, too) in the hour leading up to the event. Sure I had protein, and yes I’d been working out to prepare, but what if I didn’t make it through? What if, out of everyone in the class, I couldn’t complete the 3 hours? I did start to have my doubts but I tried to focus on other things and push them out of my head!
I want to freshen up the mantel in this room as well, so I will have to save the pictures from that corner of the room for another post when I have that finished. And, I am still working on some finishing touches in the new family room...
Last words of Nurse Edith Cavell, shot before a firing squad, October 1915
4 c. flour (sifted)
And out he goes,
Right now we have 3 high-rise Condo projects including 1 high-rise Condo Hotel project which are located right in the center of in Cebu City and and all of these high-rise condo projects are on the pre-selling stage:
Derrek had enough things to mill around in his head; the lay of the land was impossible to tell walking down the narrow hallway framed by trees and the eerie absence of animal noise did not leave Derrek feeling comfortable.
Sitting there, learning about Nicaea and Tertullian, I felt like I’d been adopted and just been told these aren’t my “real” parents. I wanted to know where I really came from. I think this is a feeling a lot of theology students sense, who may come from similar backgrounds. It’s the result of the tendency to treat the past irreverently sometimes. It’s common for Non-Denominational’s to act like the Church began 50 years ago. For the AG churches it sometimes felt like Pentecost was actually just Azusa a 100 years ago. When speaking the reformed Church, Calvinists, and Lutherans it sometimes feels like nothing ever happened before Luther, Calvin, or Zwingli. Maybe not Zwingli since he’s like the fourth Baldwin brother no one knows. The more I studied, I even saw the same tendency in Catholicism to act like our faith really only took hold with the Fathers, as if there isn’t an entire legacy of Judaism we were birthed from.
GC: Finally, if you were not a hockey player, what job would you like to have, and why?
In the meanwhile, the Epigoni took the city. Among others they captured Tiresias' daughter, whom they dedicated to Delphi. Most Argive commanders returned rich to their cities after having sacked Thebes, but the city they handed over to Thersander, who became king of Thebes. And this concluded the Second War with Thebes and the Seven were avenged by their sons. (except Aegialeus)
Produced by Thom Monahan (Vetiver, Little Joy) and recorded in various studios between Brooklyn,NY, and Los Angeles, CA, the CD features songs written by all three ladies and has a strong thematic cohesion, as if composed by a singular voice.
Sunday I began my red velvet cake mix search while doing my regular shopping at the local Tom Thumb (that's Randalls to you Houstonians) and was unsuccessful. On my way home, I stopped by my always favorite, never-fail Target. Of course they didn't have any, either. Little did I realize, THREE GROCERY TRIPS LATER there is no red velvet cake mix in the city of Dallas (zip code of 75240 and $8 "gourmet" mixes don't count). I know I have purchased this mix before, because I have made red velvet cupcakes a handful of times including right before Christmas. Something is up.
of N100 million given him by
About an hour before cooking, remove the meat from the refrigerator to get to room temperature. Brown the meat on all sides in just enough oil to grease a skillet . Place the browned meat on a flat rack in a shallow pan. Bake at 300 degrees for 15 minutes to the pound for rare or 20 minutes to the pound for medium.
Why are SA cops “shocked” at murder and hijacking of British tourist?
Yes, buying a pair of shoes has always had near-supernatural effects — like instantly updating an outfit from last year or just making you feel hotter than hell. Why the obsession? I don't know. Sometimes a pair of shoes makes me feel a certain way. Each pair has some association with it, certain situations in which I will wear it. I like to have the perfect pair for any given occasion. Also, if I find a pair that looks really cool, and it fits, and the price is right, I will buy it even if I don't need it. I don't have any other vices, so I will allow myself this one guilty pleasure ;).
Grant you that, too.
1/4 cup flaxseed
Into the Shadows
My modest Sunday ambition is to be outside for at least a half hour. Doable! even if it's pouring down rain.
An implication of engaging with a Serra sculpture could be that they nurture the habit to move, to invoke, to inspire, and to will the spectator to make a move, The spectators walking through demand their interaction to give their movement and receive movement
It was the best game ever – yet to be built in real life. I mourn the possibility that no one’s going to build it in my lifetime. I was thrilled when I saw a certain NPC that was modelled after Kenshin the Rurounin/Battousai – the perfect companion for exploring the continents and the best sparring partner. Arctic Fox and I have similar ideas when it comes to gaming and socialising!
5. These ads treat viewers like idiots - viewers are idiots! Especially the ones who don’t like these ads! And anyway, who cares what viewers think? You’d think they were a crucial part of our economic fabric or something. Newsflash, idiots – simple economics tells us that there’s no place for consumers in a post-industrial society: large companies generate wealth by advertising their products using the media owned by other large companies. That wealth is then distributed wantonly – and thus perfectly – by the United States Federal Reserve, derivatives traders and Harvey Normal retail outlets. Where do consumers come in? THEY DON’T! SO SHUT UP!
They've all got fucking satellites."
A specific pace was specified for each of the runs. They were generally at the Marathon Pace (10:24 minutes/mile) plus 30 – 45 seconds per mile. For the first 9 weeks, I completely ignored the paces. I just ran whatever felt comfortable, which was usually around 9:50 minute/miles at the start of each run. My Sunday runs were nearly always followed by Sunday rehearsal, so I felt pressure to get the run over with as quickly as possible in order to move on to the next agenda item. Running too fast may have contributed to my failure to complete some of the early long runs. Shortly after the Heart Mini, I started following the prescribed, slower, paces for the rest of my runs and, for the most part, completed the distances.
so these figure prominently as my favorite subjects!
I suspect one reason so many shy away from confronting the obvious is because it raises extremely troubling questions about the role of police in American society. Most middle class Americans see the primary role of police as maintaining public order and safety. Instances when police are clearly trying to foment violence and disorder for political purposes so fly in the face of everything we have been taught that our instinct is to tell ourselves it isn’t happening: there must have been some provocation, or else, it must have just been individual rogue cops. Certainly not something ordered by the highest echelons. But here we have to remember the police are an extremely top-down, centralized organization. Uniformed officers simply cannot behave in ways that flagrantly defy the law, in full public view, on an ongoing basis, without having at least tacit approval from those above.
However overall I enjoyed the game as a whole, although I have yet to play the optional story arc at the end. It is definitely worth replaying especially since the Tales games come with a New Game + option that allows you to transfer some things from past playthroughs. This makes it much easier to complete everything in the game since it is extremely difficult to in one playthrough.
Your gallant rain-bowed figure,
An ounce of mother is worth a pound of clergy.--Spanish Proverb
But I need this scan. The magic scan. The scan which will reveal all.
Woohoo! I’m very excited!
CUT chicken into thin slices; place on salads. Top with cheese.
5. Death Don't Have No Mercy
Set timers and play ‘beat the clock.’ Give yourself time limits for completing small tasks, and try to complete those tasks before the timer goes off.
“It just makes me feel happy and like I did something to help the world,” he said.
I will post the recipe I used, though, because it was really good. I made cheese and potato pierogies and my family loved them! It was an easy recipe and so delicious!
It’s a question that a lot of people in the peak oil community ask themselves right now, and for good reason. To those who’ve grasped the hard physical realities that undergird peak oil—the geological and thermodynamic limits to our planet’s fossil fuel supplies, the net energy issues and energy subsidies that make replacement of fossil fuels so challenging, and the rest of it—the arguments generally marshalled against the reality of peak oil look like bizarre exercises in paralogic. Weirdly, too, when those paralogical arguments fail—when the insistence by economists that the supply of oil will always increase with rising prices, for example, collides with the reality that the price of oil has increased drastically since 2004 without any corresponding increase in supply—nobody stops and asks the questions that seem obvious to those of us who are already on the peak oil bus.
G'Day Beer Lovers, I hope your attempts to raise awareness and funds for Men's Health initiatives is going as well as your no-Mo Growing is.
Merry Christmas to you and yours!
Whisk the flour and baking powder in a medium bowl. Using an electric mixer, beat the sugar, butter, lemon zest, and salt in a large bowl to blend. Beat in the eggs, one at a time. Add the flour mixture and beat until just blended. Stir in the pistachios and cranberries.
Not long ago I could remember my parents getting mad at me for talking way too much, and eventually leading me to getting in trouble. I always asked honest and to the point questions, never leaving any doubt in people’s minds, what I was asking. I always thought the whole truth was always better, and I still do. But lately I have started to see the light a bit better. What my parents got mad at me about wasn’t what I was asking but rather, it was how I asked, when I asked and who I asked.
It's Ppppppppppphhhhhhhhhht.
I have also seen Willie Mays interviewed and he loves to talk about baseball. He seems like an intelligent and friendly man. If he hates doing memorabilia shows so much, I think he could find a better way to spend his time, plus, no doubt a man of his fame could find other ways to make money. Much like most people would rather remember Willie Mays young and running first to third, losing his hat in a blur rather than the broken down player he was with the Mets, I would much rather remember Willie Mays, the baseball player and not Willie Mays, the retired autograph seller.
Moi Dix Moix’s Stage Tech, and the band members themselves were quite… selective about their setup. Immediately after setting up the drums in our perfectly practiced configuration, the band began setting up their equipment and our drum configuration was quickly disassembled and put back together… to what I swear was the exact same arrangement as what we had set up. In any case, I persevered through the setup and after requesting a few other changes, they seemed, for the most part, under their extravagant costumes and intimidating makeup, pretty content.
Be the change you want to see.
rosemary and/or thyme
"It's important for us to reduce our emissions of pollutants and greenhouse gases that may be significant contributors."
Oh the horror!!
For such people, the charge of racism is a handy way to bully those who disagree with them. If you want to replace the welfare state, you are a racist. If you want an educational system that teaches young people how to find the truth, you are a racist. If you believe in the Anglo-American heritage of rule by law and would insist on using the English language so that everyone can fully understand that heritage, you are a racist.
The other thing I found was to be in a relationship meant togetherness, which I’m all for, but not all the time I like to have the freedom to do the things I want, we all have our own interests and you can enjoy and participate in theirs, however I like the separateness and then coming together as it adds dimension to your relationship.
DAD: Hey Lawyer, I'm a little hurt.
The Paul Phenomenon only feeds a loony delusion that the GOP is somehow your "hold the nose" second-best choice. That somehow, in some twilight zone universe, the democrats are... worse? A crazy idea if you actually list policies that might get negotiated with one major party or the other.
Which of the qualities in Philemon (vv.. 4-7) do I wish to further develop for myself? That I may be active in sharing my faith. How could doing so cause me to grow in new areas. I would learn to trust God better, that he will guide me.
Director: Rupert Wyatt
I said, “This does not sound like it will work out. Perhaps you should just cut your losses and realize he is never going to change…”
As a prominent figure in the Weather Underground — which was initially known as simply “Weatherman” — Dohrn helped lead the “Days of Rage” Chicago riot, and during her tenure the group was responsible for numerous bombings of government buildings…She’s now a law professor at Northwestern University, and her husband, fellow Weather Underground co-founder William Ayers, is a retired education professor at the University of Illinois at Chicago.
No one knows for sure how old he was, since his birth records were long ago lost in bureaucratic red tape.
it would nice for people to get to see it in its entirety.
“Saving the world, one square foot at a time.”
a little money.
"I find most 'folk' singers, folk clubs and festivals are incredibly conservative these days and my wish is that a niche might be found in there for some forward musical movement and thinking to bring itself into the 21st century and that this c.d. might be a small contribution toward that end."
The right word can also evoke the right mood. If I say “The wind gusted through the glade,” the reader can get a sense of strong wind, maybe even a chill. But if I say “The wind hushed through the glade,” the meaning is entirely changed. The wind is gentler, calming, perhaps it’s even warm. Or it could be cool, but the effect is what’s important.
20 - Burl Ives - A Little Bitty Tears - 2:05
Well, tough cookies asthma sufferers! You should have written bigger checks to the Democratic party while you had the chance.
B5 Beyond......
I hope you have all enjoyed my descent into madness over the past 365 days. It's been a hell of a ride. When I sat down to write this post I was disappointed. Not because the year is over. THANK GOD it is. Time has to keep marching on to get us out of this terrible two phase. I was disappointed because I didn't think this year was as good as last year photo-wise. Story-wise I think it was better but I didn't think the photos measured up.
and thank you for being
What does this make me, a journalist? If I share news stories through social media and my blogs does this make me a journalist?
With their fixed notions of how whites perceive the world, the stated goal of these social crusaders is to alter the values and attitudes of these young people. Using diversity orientations to probe into the most private experiences and thoughts of students their aim is to persuade the white person to remold his inner life, until it is consistent with the multicultural vision. This is Thought Reform at its crudest – an attempt at mind cleansing under the guise of achieving “social justice” for society’s underdogs.
The Smartards have really spent a lot of time in your mouth, haven’t they? Well, they can continue that trend with flavored condoms. Because sexual protection needs to taste nummy.
Well friends, I am off to start my busy day. The girls have dance class and I promised Sophie I would take her to Build A Bear today as a reward for finally getting rid of that pacifier (or as she likes to call it, her “B”). Stay tuned later this week for the Mother’s Day Blog Hop, which will feature lots of fabulous inspiration for your mother’s day projects!
1457: Take a bus back to the station
I have also been having (too) much fun making these Christmas cards. I could do it ALL day long. Hope you enjoy!
Shopping online is another way to stay at home. Most of our curriculum and book purchases are done online as is most of our Christmas and birthday shopping. I generally try to get book purchases and gift shopping done when I find great clearance sales on products we love.
If you are planning a holiday or a major corporate event in May or June, go ahead, your plans won’t be disrupted.
I. Howard Marshall
enjoying every second of it.
Leave a comment below(with your email address) telling how you like to teach retelling in your classroom.
Its been a crazy rollercoaster of a week (...its that Moon vibe again!) but it all seems to have settled again now. Little J has had Chicken Pox and been having some pretty spectaular tantrums too but he seems back to his usual self now..phew. Anyways, there were plenty of joyous moments betwixt the crazy including...
And when I say attorney, I mean someone who graduated from law school, passed the bar, and is licensed to practice in that jurisdiction. Some masquerade as attorneys (like this guy who used someone else’s bar number and fooled a firm into thinking he was an attorney) or others tell you that they are just as good (notarios). California allows for non-lawyer immigration agencies that fill out applications, but they are strict about what they can do and can’t do (they can’t dispense legal advice nor represent clients in legal proceedings) and they have to post a bond with the state. Of course I’m biased, but there are problems with these agencies . . .
Raised by a bibliophile who made the dining room into a library, Theresa has always been a lover of books and stories. First a writer for newspapers, then for national magazines, she started her first novel in high school, eventually enrolling in a Writer's Digest course and putting the book under the bed until she joined Romance Writers of America in 1993.
Stepping Heavenward by Elizabeth Prentiss. I breezed through this book last summer. It is a fictionalized account, but based heavily on Prentiss' own experiences. It follows one woman from age 16, in 1831, through motherhood and beyond. It is written in journal form. Deep thoughts such as sanctification and good works and why and how we should do them are tackled in this book as well as the transforming power of change that can occur when we submit to God.
Finish: Hastings Station TQ814096
Right, better go, 2,000 jobs to do before school kicks out in half an hour, and it's the dreaded swimming lessons to be a taxi service for too. More soon. Well, sooner than a whole month, anyway, I hope... x
So, why do we use double-spacing? Basically, because it's tradition. It's what writers always have done, since the days when anything printed, be it newspaper, magazine, or book, was published using hot metal presses. An editor would take a double-spaced typescript, use the extra space between each sentence to annotate to the typesetter any changes that needed making, or inserting any special instructions to the typesetter about headings, or inserting images, and then send the document to the typesetter for setting out on the metal presses.
It said that during Zikalala's time, stories on matters raised by either their union mother body the Congress of SA Trade Unions or the SA Communist Party that were deemed critical of the economic policies of former president Thabo Mbeki were thrown out.
So LOVE keeps no records of wrongs.
Dogs naturally attack from behind.
They have no idea how much they've helped me.
I ordered extra t-shirts, so now I'm already looking to make more quirky t-shirts for the family.
“Indeed,” came a muffled response from somewhere to his left. Obadiah strained to see where the voice had come from but the night was very dark.
But him asking about The Plan is only a little bit irritating. Having a half-hour long discussion on why I'm irritated would be VERY IRRITATING! By the time that I'm done writing this post, I'm going to be over it, so what is the point?
The movie was gripping and beautiful, drenched in deep characters, harsh, wild Britain... and lots of rain and blood.
Yesterday morning I received a very calm text message informing me that your waters had broken. You were staying at home, reading the papers, and waiting to see what happened next. When I phoned you at 5pm, you were walking around the local shops in the pouring rain, having only had two contractions in two hours. At that point, you sounded as though you were going into the zone. So I was not at all surprised to hear that the contractions were coming hard and fast at 9pm.
An insulated place to live that protects from the weather's worst faces, enough food and water to survive and keep healthy, a few outfits (vs. closets full of them) , decent health care, to name the important few.
which not many of my girls do...
Expecting love from everyone.
Then I choose a nice bright place to work in natural light. Usually that means the kitchen table, but given the table’s constant use, it is not always the best pick. (And since I have children, you will notice that the natural light in this photo has long since disappeared). I have to adapt to working on a large piece of cardboard or wood.
If you blog, would like to start blogging, or feel like you need to inject some new life into your blog, you should get a copy of Lori's eBook, Follow the Path. Just check out her blog, Pretty Things, and locate the icon on the right-hand side bar. Follow the Path is available for $15 as an instant download, delivered as a PDF file and can be saved on your computer or printed out.
Until we confront that reality, victories over terrorism will be short-lived. Peace will be elusive.
13. Don't Let It Bring You Down
It’s three months later and she does clean the cage now, wearing a clothes-peg on her nose to keep out the smell.
Beyond that, it's none of my business.
The Languedoc Lady is a retired (I’m guessing quite early) Californian living in Southwest France with her husband. Her posts remind me of my own luck in being married to a woman who’s parents moved to Aix-en-Provence many years ago. Southern France is a blogger’s dream indeed.
On the New York Observer's Real Estate blog yesterday, Eliot Brown mined a April 9 "webinar" by the Metropolitan Transportation Authority, in which executive director Elliot (Lee) Sander expressed concern about the whereabouts of the $100 million in cash that developer Forest City Ratner in 2005 agreed to pay for the agency's Vanderbilt Yard.
Jasper is from a rich and influential family and despite Ana’s condition, wants to be with her. The authorities grant Ana a tentative reprieve. If she is joined to Jasper before her 18th birthday, she may stay in the Community until her illness manifests. But if Jasper changes his mind, she will be cast out among the Crazies. As Ana’s joining ceremony and her birthday loom closer, she dares to hope she will be saved from the horror of the City and live a ‘normal’ life. But then Jasper disappears.
For the next 15 years Regal enjoyed compounded growth of 25% per year and at times even more. In 1988 we broke ground on a second manufacturing plant in Smithville, Tennessee, a new $4 million facility. The timing of our January 1989 opening could not have been worse. The boating industry was on the verge of one of the hardest recessions it had ever experienced since the oil embargo of 1973. We found ourselves with so much debt that we had to sell the Smithville plant to give us immediate relief.
We had a good Saturday. We had tickets to a show for the Munchkin and us for the late afternoon. Saturday morning was a hustle and bustle as it usually is when everyone is trying to get ready at the same time. He did slice a little time out for His own enjoyment. He called me into His bathroom and made me drop to my knees and suck His dick then He fucked me from behind till He came. I was already extremely randy because I had been on denial since my little mishap on Monday.
It is the general belief in certain African cultures that the woman is always to blame when she has not borne a child. Some people are of the view that such a woman is a witchcraft, she has been cursed and therefore should be an outcast.
Till we meet again, everybody!! Have a good day!! ♥♥♥
I’m not sure if we had reciprocated Singapore’s remembrance of old Manila (as most of our new streets are named after politicians these days) but hopefully one day we can return the favor. Manila is not a main street, more like an alley that you would hardly noticed when you happen to pass by but significant none the less. There aren’t that many places here named after a city or a country.
(D'oh, just a few minutes late this week...a little better than the last I guess!)
Maybe Socialism is a bit like the flu: It keeps mutating, and as soon as your immune system has defeated one strain, it changes just enough so that your body does not recognize it and then mounts another attack.
I'd have to say my favorite practical bookstore is Half Price Books here in Des Moines (which is a chain) and then my favorite "fun" bookstore would be The Vault, in Oskaloosa, Iowa. It's an old bank!
LLL: I never planned to spend more than half my life in foreign countries. Like so many things that happen to us, it just happened. Determined to become a poet (and undoubtedly under the influence of the exile generation of F. Scott Fitzgerald et al.) I went to Paris to study for a year after university and my first joblets. And one thing led to another, including two longish spells in Germany, where during the first one I met my spouse, and sandwiched in between, eighteen years in Zimbabwe.
Are you currently working on any new novels? If so, could you tell us a little about it?
One final point on things I like to see in a query that were not included here. It's always helpful to see that an author has researched me and my books, and then indicate that his or her project might suit my list as a result. That type of personal attention goes a long way in making something stand out. Also, it's a good idea if you can come up with a valid comparison to another book or books in the marketplace that might appeal to a similar audience. Finally, a bit of background information about the author's personal life, and any previous writing experience or credentials. All of it should be brief, and professional.
Copyright Date: May 2011
What do you need to know about it?
We plan on releasing these in short 2-3 minute videos that focus on one aspect of the site at a time - from designing a store to adding and reviewing books, visiting other bookstores, and how to gain more coins with which to decorate your store...
But then something weird happened.
and pushes them back down the ramp and onto the floor.
Some people are organized, some people are not. And then you have people like me – the type that want to be prepared for everything that may happen and thus are over-organized (sometimes leading to jokes made by my colleagues).
WANDA- "I died of a massive heart-attack. I suspected that my husband
It's called social media and Ben Wallace has used Twitter to go from the depths of absolute obscurity in Amazon.com's rankings to literally owning the top spots in his genre--comic fiction.
One of the CC things I bought (well, several) was the Snowman products, all of them, CD's and stamps, they are fab, so fab in fact that I had to use them to make something really special. So armed with a tutorial that Sara Davies did on the CC forum during birthday week, I made 24 individual slider boxes and then stuck them all together and created this. I've wanted to do one of these for ages but until I saw the tutorial (using the ultimate pro) I didn't know how to make the slider boxes, but they are soo easy, it was great. All of the papers used on the advent calendar are from CC as well, and of course the gorgeous snowmen stamps, and to top it off, I used my CC Spectrum Noirs to colour the images.
Photo Tamara Gooch
Pulled up the bank account again to check my theory and discovered.....
Carrying the flag for the GTA are four veterans of the scene who are intent on being more than cannon fodder for the other poets — they come ready to unleash with both barrels blazing:
its like dreaming in blueray with dolby 7.9 surround sound
If you haven't read this book, I highly recommend it. It is sweet and short and certainly thought provoking.
vegetable stock can be of any vegetables: ive used potato,carrot,beans and capsicum.
Women account for only 3% of the chief executives at the helm of the 500 biggest U.S. Companies[1]. There is a large disparity in pay between female and male executives. Mary Ellen Page writes that “according to compensation experts, the disparity in pay can be attributed, in part, to the tendency of female executives to choose a straightforward salary and bonus package over stock and options laden one.” Women get paid on current business performance; in essence, their pay is tied more closely to the firm’s performance. Women have to work harder to advance in the workplace and often have to take on riskier assignments, improve their negotiation skills, and grow a tougher skin.
16-ounce pint glass.
Moreover, the new state won’t provide these residents with any services: It expects UNRWA – or, more accurately, the American and European taxpayers who provide the bulk of that organization’s funding – to continue providing their schooling, healthcare, welfare allowances, etc.
A young man who loved stick ball, The Boston Red Sox, and "The Drink"..... a little too much......
* SOUND BITES VIDEO ARE AT THE END OF THE BLOG !
But aside from all that, this is a hit in the house :)
